Sanjay Mehrotra is president and chief executive officer of SanDisk, effective January 2011. He was appointed to the SanDisk board of directors in July 2010, appointed president and chief operating officer in June 2006, and co-founded in 1988.
Your Keirsey Temperament Sorter Results indicates that your personality type is that of the Artisan.
However often we wind up going, there’s little doubt we’ll have a ball. It’s a world-class city that’s only 2 hours from home (what could be easier?) – but more importantly, we love our friends and want to spend more time with them. So get read Montreal. We’ll be back soon.
no justice in the justice system
About two weeks ago, we discovered a whole new world of wonderful textures and flavors. That's right...TABLE FOOD! Ella has always been a great eater; there are very few things that she flat-out does not like (example: raspberries and strawberries because they're tart.), so you can imagine my surprise and frustration when she suddenly wanted nothing to do with any of her baby food. After ruling out several possible causes for her sudden food strike, it was determined that she simply became bored of baby food. And boy, were we right! The tiny girl can put away an entire banana in one sitting (bananas have always been a favorite), and she loves her some chicken and stars, and (get this), biscuits and gravy. She is her father's child indeed.
Postlethwaite was one of my favorite actors of all time. Apparently I was in good company - Spielberg called him "the best actor in the world."
The nurse manager told this nursing colleague that they were obligated to investigate the allegation but felt that the patient was “cuckoo” and basically left the complaint at that. The issue at hand here is that many patients complain about the nursing care that is provided in many institutions today. Healthcare organizations are focused so much on Press Ganey scores that a perception of inequity exists so that most nurses are already behind the eight ball and feel the need to be defensive when describing their actions when it comes to patient care. Because hospitals in general are so patient slanted nurses have a very difficult time proclaiming their innocence. This is true even with the most mundane patient complaint. Over the years I have spoken to many nurses that have had complaints against them from patients. The feelings of inadequacy, stress as well as concern for their continued employment are real feelings that nurses go through when it comes to patient complaints. The sad truth is that most nurses perceive that hospitals will not support them during any time of difficulty.
Hi everyone! I hope you are having a great day! I can't believe how fast time is flying these days. School is almost over and I am planning our summer vacation. What? I haven't even come close to scrapping all of last years summer vacation. lol Like that will ever happen.
The first NBC broadcast is scheduled for July 1, the final day of the America’s Cup World Series in Newport, R.I. The other dates on NBC are Aug. 26 and Oct. 7, so America’s Cup organizers will fit events to those slots. Organizers are exploring having an ACWS stop on the Hudson River in New York, which would end on Aug. 26. If that’s not possible, there would be ACWS stops in San Francisco ending with televised races on Aug. 26 and Oct. 7.
San Diego County supervisors unanimously approved a plan yesterday to deal with thousands of lower-level criminals by housing them in local jails instead of state prisons and requiring county probation officers to supervise them, but not before questioning the state for forcing the change on them, the San Diego Union-Tribune reports.
Cook the pasta according to package directions. While the pasta is cooking, heat 1 tablespoon of the olive oil in a large saute pan over medium high heat. Once heated, add the shrimp and saute, stirring frequently. Add 2 cloves of the minced garlic, the juice of 1/2 of the lemon, 1/2 cup of the white wine, 2 tablespoons butter or margarine, pepper to taste, and Melting Pot Seasoning (or any lemon/garlic seasoning) to taste. Continue cooking until shrimp are pink and cooked through.
Wide Screen
“He is a changed man,” said Jackson. “He has reformed his life. He has expressed deep remorse and deep regret.
f) they are cool to wear in the heat
“Lord, please help me not be so determined to have a picnic that I miss what You’re saying. Help me to be open to Your plan for my day, and for my life. Show me the path You’d have me take. Help me pay attention to the Words that are coming out of Your mouth!
Reduce heat to medium. Add onion, bell peppers, and garlic to pan; cook 7 minutes or until tender, stirring frequently. Stir in olives and next 5 ingredients (through black pepper); cook 30 seconds or until fragrant. Stir in vinegar, scraping pan to loosen browned bits; cook for 2 minutes or until liquid almost evaporates. Stir in broth, tomato paste, and bay leaves. Add steaks; bring to a simmer. Cover, reduce heat, and cook 1 1/2 hours or until steaks are very tender. Discard bay leaves.
Face Bullying With Confidence
“I suppose it was the end of the world for her when her husband and her baby were killed. I suppose she didn’t care what became of her and flung herself into the horrible degradation of drink and promiscuous copulation to get even with life that had treated her so cruelly. She’d lived in heaven and when she lost it she couldn’t put up with the common earth of common men, but in despair plunged headlong into hell. I can imagine that if she couldn’t drink the nectar of the gods any more she thought she might as well drink bathroom gin.’
It's just very unfortunate.
sew the side and bottom seam of piece4 and body together, as well.
The hard truth is that I am totally messed-up on school. I believe that it is the magic fix to all life’s problems, when in reality it is just an incredibly expensive cushion that will only soften my inevitable ignominious decent into my parents basement to live alone unable to hold a job.
My Christmas wish is to tell them that though their spirits now walk this realm and the next, their love remains alive in my heart.
So, taking about feeling normal, there have been some good points to the week. Firstly, the mad panic project at work wasn't a mad panic. No-one "crossed the streams" so we're all good. Any IT work that doesn't involve a full restore and hoping the back-up tapes hold out is a win in my book. ;-) Wee Man did well on his School Report and he had a great time at his birthday party a few weeks ago. Little Miss, I can't believe how much she's grown up. She's on her way to being 3 and both her - and her brother - are a delight to take to the park. I think it's the reckless joy they seem to have. The Ever Lovely Mrs Jones is hanging on in there, she's been there for me and I don't know what I'd do without her. The weather's also taken turn to a more traditional British summer - as in, it's raining. So good for the plants, water supply and it's no longer baking hot. Good stuff.
They can be worn as a dress, with leggings or as a layer over another dress. Even a coat.
I have become sort of well-known for my walls of text in conversations of privilege and marginalization, and one of the reasons I post them is because simply telling people to educate themselves doesn’t work. I mean, realistically, we are all grown adults who know how to use The Google. Given sufficient interest in not hurting each other’s feelings, a person so motivated could just… go find one of the many many places on the internet where this has been explained and just learn how on their own.
Warm soft pastel illustrations make the boardwalk an inviting place to be. Young readers will love finding their favorite things to do and eat. Families, friends and shop owners will make this a memorable read. Kids will have fun with colors, shapes and discussing all of the
This quote by John Gay has defined me since the discovery of the hate group. Yes the situation was absolutely terrible, but I got to see who my true friends were and became stronger because of it. Don’t ever give up.
As I see it, the Obama administration needs to act decisively in this manner and punish those responsible. The wasteful spending of the GSA clearly constitutes corruption and could even be cast as the theft of federal funds. As such, I do not think that criminal charges would be out of place here. At the very least, all the money beyond the legitimate expenditures should be returned by those responsible. That should help deter future cases of this sort of foolishness.
National Child Pornography Tipline and CyberTipline
The world says we have to fight for our rights and our freedom. God says He has given us our freedom. The world says we have to earn respect. God says we must respect everyone, whether they ‘earn’ it or not.
For some reason, she thought this was hilarious. She left them there for a few days and would laugh every time she saw him. It was funny. She is such a little clown.
To tempt us, crusted with loose gems
2. Doctor 4
to store your faded memories.
It was a long post, I know. Here I sign off, promising to see you again with a Guest Post. Till then, Happy Cooking and Happy Blogging!
The Four O'Clock Press Packages:
When he attended the Davos World Economic Summit in Switzerland, he charged £256.98 for a pair of ‘heavy-duty shoes’ – presumably to cope with the snow. The summit for tycoons and world leaders features a series of free dinners and cocktail parties, yet he charged £1.89 for a cup of coffee.
WHAT IT’S ABOUT:
1. Start with a contextually appropriate premise. Why would somebody call a fast food restaurant? To ask for directions or hours of operation, to make some complaint (an incredibly fertile premise for a creative prank caller), or maybe to inquire about a menu item. Not to ask for advice about swollen testicles. The premise of trying to scam free food by complaining about food that you never actually bought is very believable because it’s something we deal with all the time.
So I wandered over to a couple sites of friends to read what's been going on. Lots of fun and entertainment for both Dorito and Ms. Squidgessence, and then I realized one of my concerns. Not that this is a competition but sweet Mother Of Mary, look at these blogs. They are actually interresting with pictures and videos and humour and stuff. An Ox and Red Cat? The ramblings of a cable jockey. ....And no pictures or videos. Yikes, I have to get up to the times and become creative. I see that I have to keep posting just to keep the party downa dn the general noise around here to a dull roar.
BY WADE MCMILLIN, Couchsideshow.com editor
John West's name must always be uttered in full - "John West".
Congrats to Mama Velveeta!
Next I stopped at this school. There were some kids playing carom in the verandah so I figured it must be a school. So I went in and asked this guy who turned out to be a teacher if I could just sit there and rest a while. There were four or five teachers there and they were most gracious. I wanted to just sit in the verandah but they insisted I sit on a chair inside and they even asked me if I’d like some lunch but I declined saying I’d just eaten. I offered them grapes in return and they were quite surprised to be offered grapes by the traveler, taking only one each. We talked for some time, in English, which most of them could speak, and answered each others’ questions. But it’s only so long you can keep chatting and again I couldn’t really take a nap there so I decided to go on. I offered the kids playing carom grapes before I left and they were really shy and burst out laughing, only to be curtly told by the woman watching over them to behave like humans in front of the stranger. For some reason I’d thought this bit would be all industrial towns all the way to Shimoga but I was pleasantly surprised to find small towns and villages dotting the largely agricultural landscape. A few ks down the road I finally found a nice bus-stop, deserted but dusty, you can’t have everything now can you? It was 2:30pm by now and incredibly hot. I pulled the cycle in with me and lay down to take a short nap.
Lynsker came up with the theme and we both got to play and then see what we came up with individually. I have to say that drawing fish is definitely not my forte but a good exercise. Lynsker, on the other hand, has finesse with the animal kingdom.
Today's New Oldie is a parody of The Battle Of New Orleans, smash crossover hit for Johnny Horton in 1959. The song went to #1 on both the Country and Pop charts in Billboard and Cashbox. It even made it to #3 on the R&B charts, which is nearly unheard of for a Country song. The song was also a #1 hit in Sydney, Australia and in Canada on 1050 CHUM-AM in Toronto in May 1959.
Not sure if this is completely useful, but it's interesting.
If you take the time to listen to a CD, a band, a song, a genre and you absolutely hate it, fair enough. I have artists that I don’t particularly care for, too. I will say that when they have new singles, I give them a listen and then make my decision. But if you do hate every single piece of music other than your handful or two, that’s perfectly fine. But if you’re going to protest something so hard, at least take the time to know why.
Followed by two hours of tuney doings spun by Piley and myself. A no-wave set where anything was winged into the improv' playlist - TV Themes (Eurotrash, Grandstand), Bowie, Beatles booty remixes and covers, foreign language editions (a latin Hit the Road Jack)......
There are many things that I wish I could change about my life, but there are very few things that I regret.
and aroused lovers laughing as
If you have been nominated, here is what you do to keep it rolling:
There must be a lot more potential success criteria. But this is my list for now. 7 steps to collaboration heaven.
Was like the conscious being of the book.
Box of gallon freezer bags with the zipper closure (TRUST ME. Get the zippered ones!)
They can hide, create a veil, bring illusion or even Newly Reveal.
I'm crocheting egg cozies, a baby afghan, and working on tatting on a handkerchief. I also have to make an afghan, a hat, and work on puppet costumes. Between family and friend showers and events, church, and my shop I'm stretched pretty thin. I have to try to accomplish most of this by Easter.
is IT.
Its peculiar how the science manuals talk about flowers "tricking" bees, wasps, butterflies buy dowsing them with pollen as they gather nectar. The pervasiveness of humanising nature, or yet more anthropocentrism? Do flowers really have deceptive thoughts? It occurs to me that there is a human desire to demonstrate that we fully understand nature. Scientists take a part into the lab. poke it, prod it, test it, & come up with the theory of how it works. Yet isn't it more liberating to marvel at such intricacy, such beauty & not have to understand it. My views of science are tainted by that discipline's yearning to first understand something & then exploit it for profit.
SHORT TERM: market bounces around in volatile session, DOW +72
Second, we went on a field trip with our Spanish class. It is nice, because they are paid for, except for our food and souvenirs. We don’t have to drive, or park, or get lost, it’s up to our Spanish teacher and the drivers to get us where we are going. We went to a small town just outside of Asunción, called Areguá. It is near Lake Ypacaraí, and it is a pretty little town. There is a hill close by called Cerro Koi; it is one of only three places in the world where you find natural hexagonal shaped rocks. It was all very interesting. The funny part of the story is when we were riding home and Kevin and I saw a truck full of wooden furniture in the bed, lashed on the top, and lashed on the back. And it was not a nice truck, with a covered cargo area. It was an old junker, with an old green tarp covering the back. And it was also full of guys, maybe five or six guys riding among the furniture. We looked at each other and said, “That’s the RC Willey truck.” We have had several workers at our house, painters, carpenters, locksmith, internet, and only the internet guys came in a truck from their company, the same as you would expect in the United States. Everyone else has come on foot from the bus stop, or on a motorcycle. It has really shown me what a different world I am experiencing.
Just for shits and giggles, I tried again a few times after the challenge to see if I could do it any faster, but I found out that I just don’t have the face for it. Jenny’s lovely face is a bit wider/flatter than mine is, and I have to imagine that helped her because any time I tried to move the cookie quickly, it would flip up and roll off my face.
What makes Tom Venuto different? Well he does tell you what to eat, he only gives you the guide lines of what food combinations are bad for you and when to eat what. This makes it a lifestyle change as you are able to stay within a budget and still be healthy, fit and lean.
And by the time you do get to speak with someone, are you receptive to what they have to say??
CARE has been collecting signatures for an online petition to set up a law prohibiting animal abusers from raising animals again.
Eel River Brewing Co Fortuna, CA Organic IPA IPA
Primary colors. Dick and Jane fabric. Alphabets with red and white checks. These will work, too. I can't wait to get started! Alas, it will have to wait just a little bit.
What's made me, ME........
I have also starting watching vintage dress patterns and fabrics with a view to making the third attempt in my life at teaching myself to actually follow a pattern. My first purchase arrived in the post this morning, so when I finally get around to ordering some fabric, finding the right binding tape and the perfect buttons, I'll let you know how this goes.
Aside from this fresh way of thinking, I am back on track for posting. Sorry, I feel that sometimes when my life gets too chaotic my blog is the one that suffers; however, it's almost been 1 year of blogging and I haven't quit...(and don't intend to). I am still here and trying to balance my life.
The liquid at the bottom of the bin, is usually run off as the food is decomposing. It can often smell sour and can be too acidic for plants. It is not recommend to use this liquid on it’s own to water plants. Problem is you still have this liquid that needs to be dealt with so sometimes I just dilute it with a lot of water and still water my plants with it. Yes, it may be a bit acidic but better than dumping it down the drain or even worse letting it run off my balcony onto other balconies… Yuck!
5. (C) ANCYL Provincial Secretary Julius Malema, who was frank and friendly, started the conversation with stories of his "young pioneer" days when the ANC taught him how to use a gun 17 years ago, at the tender age of 9. He then boasted that Limpopo's ANCYL has more members than any other province and is "100 percent united" in its support of Zuma. Malema never explained why he or the league supports Zuma, but did
I think it is imperative before I begin to state that I am not religious. I don’t necessarily believe in God (although the truth of the matter is that I have no clue), and I’m not even a very “spiritual” person as many non-believers claim to be. Not to be cliché, but I look at the universe from a more scientific perspective, and see no evidence for or against the existence of God. Thereby, in accordance with Occam’s razor, I deduce that no god or higher power exists (although I suppose the Occam’s razor argument could be used against me, by saying that the existence of God is simplest explanation – although I would counter that the creation of existence of God is too immense a concept to be called simple).
Not to mention the fact that I live out in the boonies.
He says "it should be seen as art, and as within the month of October. It's Halloween, it's time to be scary it's time to be spooky."
Men had done terrible things to her. She said she loved me, and I wanted to the special one, the guy who was different and loved her for her instead of treating her like a lifeless object whose only job was gratify me.
not withstanding. The crocuses are done, and we're in the
I still feel emotionally and mentally exhausted from all the sickness and death, but at the same time, I recognize that I'm alive and I need to get back to living.
With all that in mind, I think there are some huge benefits to buying a good quality .22 semi-automatic handgun. The ammo is very cheap, you will have fun shooting it, and will also encourage your children to learn firearm safety and get comfortable with a quality weapon. I think my favorite right now is the Ruger SR .22 and I will post some videos below to let you get an idea of how great this weapon is. I was torn between the Walther P22 and the Ruger SR.22 won out for several reasons.
You don’t need a magic wand to get this deal. All you have to do is call Allure Quest Travel Experience at 615-818-8241 or 615-336-8580. Or email us at alan@allurequest.com.
In the construction of the scale it was assumed that the important thing was not to ascertain whether, on mature reflection, the person believed that there was such a thing as absolute right and wrong, but rather to ascertain on what he based his decision when confronted with a demand for decision. The scale itself therefore was designed to take no sides in the philosophical debate over whether discoverable right and wrong exists. It merely considers responding in terms of what is believed to be right and responding in terms of one's own self-interest as possible alternative bases for decision. Presumably the person who had devoted some thought to the philosophical questions involved and concluded that there was no such thing as right and wrong would always use self-interest (enlightened?) as his decision basis. For him one of the alternatives would be excluded a priori. It is assumed however that for most people the choice between doing what is right and doing what is in one's own interest was a real one. Administration instructions for the scale included the assurance to the subjects that they could use 'their own definition' of what is right. Throughout, however, the interest was not in what it was that they thought to be right but rather in the relevance this had for their policy decisions. This is to some extent the opposite of the immediate concern in most attitude scales.
My healing process isn’t something static. I will change continuously, and so will my feelings. T helped me get on track. T started this process, or perhaps it was a combined effort – either way, I started on this journey. I don’t necessarily notice the progress I have made, but the proof is in the pudding. I have altered my behavioural pattern greatly since I first started out. I no longer act out, something that is probably the biggest and most important difference.
Next week is going to be a week of major preparations. I think it will probably fly by as a result. The funny thing about all of those preparations is that last weekend at church, Preparation was the title of the sermon. It was a really good one for me to hear and it helped me get my head on a little straighter which is always a good thing.
So now I focus on healing and getting back into my normal routine. It looks like I’ll be returning to work on Wednesday for a short day and then going from there. I’m getting a little too used to not working so it’ll be an adjustment but it should be fine. There’s a lot of work to get done so it will be nice to get back.
To make a long story short, I was the second choice for him. It hurt when I found out, quite a bit, because not only was he my best friend and someone I deeply cared about, but my family loved him. My mother even referred to him as her "second son."
Other than turning into a slut, getting STD’s or pregnant.
"Now mom, she is built for gymnastics."
Here are a few pics from our Luncheon
5. Young at Heart
Oh boy, here’s a term that sets everyone’s threat-level to Defcon 1. Let’s all just calm down to a hysterical panic and examine it rationally, as scientists in a lab might pick up some radioactive substance with a robotic hand.
This went on a number of times until finally, unbelievably, we were at the end. Everyone was cheering, sweating, huffing and puffing, clapping, yelling, smiling. The energy in the room was probably at it’s highest at this one moment. Everyone was proud of themselves, proud of the person next to them, proud of Shaun.
Old friends came from Minneapolis and as always when we get together with them, the house was filled with laughter. We met them years ago at Green Lake where we used to go every summer and have become very close. The wife and my daughter are close friends as are her husband and my sons and they are nice enough to love Bill and me too.
Add a little more oil to the pan if it looks dry, and stir fry your vegetables. Add the garlic and ginger and let them fry with the vegetables till you can smell them. Add the curry paste mixture and the coconut milk. Stir to combine and bring the sauce to a simmer. Toss in the meat, scallops or tofu; if you're using shrimp, add it now. Let it all simmer together for about 5 minutes, or until the shrimp are pink, or your meat is cooked and heated through.
How much did military spending change? Was it…
parent volunteer at the boutique
Emily's card was for her science teacher, Ms. Moore, who was the favorite this year. This card was very similar but I added flower shaped buttons to make it a bit more girly:))
2 tablespoons of port
16Today the Lord your God gives you orders to keep all these laws and decisions: so then keep and do them with all your heart and all your soul.
Kuya Pidyong – Mamimiss ko malakas at bigay todo mong tawa.
I drew upon feelings from my first BDSM experience, which involved my visit with “Mistress Lynn” and “Brandi. The play activities were entirely different. Two decades later, I’m no longer Chloe, but I still have clear and powerful memories of the first meeting and the correspondence just prior to it. Even though I bottom much more than I top, writing it from the dominant perspective felt right. I’m not “Lynn”, but she taught me most of what I know about submission. I’ve also cultivated my dominant side over the years.
On the trend front, I’ve seen t-shirt hems rise, as the bustier and crop tops have returned, but nonetheless, the average length on a t-shirt from a mainstream consumer retail shop tends to run 1-2 inches too long for my frame. I would like to note, though, that styling matters. Love this Christopher Kane t, but it is 10-fold better tucked in for short ppl so the legs look longer.
Occasionally, though, I do get a wild hair and get excited about baking something. In fact, I have mastered the art of the cookie. Of course, I think that comes along with the whole package of Mommy Magic.
I haven’t accomplished a single productive thing yet today. My brain feels almost completely busted. To say I am frustrated would be a gross understatement.
On The Doctor’s Wife:
FNPS members recently received my letter describing childhood adventures in South Florida's outdoors – memorable experiences made possible thanks to preserved lands and my parents' initiative. I dug up some photos of these family trips to share with you. The quality of these photos is not the greatest - they were scanned from prints - but many readers probably have photos like these (maybe even older!) and can relate to a time without cell phones, the Internet or cable television.
But of course, dinner is where she pulls out her big guns.
The divisive war-cry ‘untuk agama, bangsa dan negara’ often used by Umno and their support groups do not seem to perturb the moderate Malays.
Born at 6:43 pm and weighing in at 7 lbs 6 oz and 20 1/2 inches long, our son Allen James is here. He is perfectly made, a beautiful reminder of love and life.
Dec 29th – should be packing for "vacation". First thing I'm doing when I get there? SHOWER! George has forbidden me from taking the laptop but I'm thinking about slipping it in the bottom of my bag. Shhhh, don't tell him. Excited to see what God is up to as we have time to just relax and talk about our plans...scratch that...God's plans for the village through us.
Partly this is due to the chronic pain. Partly it is due to mistakes on my part. Partly it is just because of chance. By turns this has made me depressed, disappointed, disgusted. Sometimes even on the brink of despair.
Note: roast each item separately or as a whole but make sure that it doesn’t get burnt i always do it separately one after the other but either way is also ok .depending upon your spice levels can adjust the measure especially Pepper corns and Whole Red chillies .
Leonard
July 2011
The Whimsy Stamps DT have been showcasing these fabulous stamps for the past 6 days, so if you missed them be sure to hop on over to the Whimsy Inspirations Blog for some more inspiration!
Some web searching on the Vid and Pid terms that I found earlier, I discovered that several USB gadgets seem to have exactly the same Vid and Pid. I don't think this is supposed to happen, so I assume that someone made a simple USB interface with a Vid and Pid embedded, and various other people decided to all use it for different gadgets. However, in this case, it does mean that a very nice man called Scott Weston (scott@weston.id.au) decided to make a gadget called Missile run under Python in 2006. The Hamster gadget shares the same Vid and Pid, and someone who seems to want to remain anonymous took Scott's work and ported it for the Hamster by doing some tests on each of the 6 bit command codes that appeared to be sent, http://brooknet.no-ip.com/~lex/public/Hamster_Wheel/web/
Hey New York Times, I don't watch HBO, because it's not for people with basic cable. Would you mind setting aside about 300 words somewhere for me to opine about their spring lineup and who should be watching it?
and tons of letters go bundled from the building to all
I didn't make eye contact with anyone in the bar in the time I was there. I believe I was the youngest guy to walk through The Stables' doors since Weezer walked in in 1972. As I looked around the ambienceless room I noticed a UMB promotional calendar on the wall. I was able to surmise that today was the 9th of January because they had methodically marked a big black X through each day of January up to the 9th, like they're counting down the days until they die. If I'd had big enough balls I would have flipped through the remaining months to see if there was a day in June marked Death Day. But I was busy plotting my escape in case they didn't take credit cards. With the previous meter payment I was down to a precise $1.96, not even half the cost of my Newcastle. Everybody else at the bar was paying with cash and I didn't see one of those wonderful Visa stickers on the door. I was pretty worried I was going to look like a giant schmuck by not being able to pay my tab. I already had heard Songbird say "them young folk sure are getting brave coming in here". I didn't want to be the one to turn them against young folk.
Robert De Niro/Charles Grodin (Midnight Run)
Winter kept us warm, covering
Call me a snob, but that’s a bit naive to think that you could get a job with the experience of “answering phones.” A ten year old could do that. When you’re eighteen, a job isn’t fluffy and gentle like a fabric softener commercial. It’s gritty, sour, physically demanding, mentally straining, emotionally damaging, crap, and the pay off is a three hundred dollar check for two weeks of work minus taxes. Benefits? What the heck are those. A first job should make you want to run for the college gates because you don’t want to spend the rest of your life serving slushies to bratty children, or stocking shelves.
Ink Showdown: In this fast-paced competition, Piranha Plants spit ink balls from the back edge of the court. Players must destroy the ink balls before they splatter, while hitting tennis balls away from an opponent.
My seven year old son has been so enthralled with this book, daily sharing with us new information he has discovered. It has been a joy to see this already excited about Jesus boy get even more excited. You can go to Amazon and learn more about and purchase this book, here.
2 jars chunky tomato sauce
Your family & friends can receive these valuable audio lessons every day and
2100.***E-X/8/2001. On the prudence of relying on Congressional declarations of war. (Incorporated in Item B-14 (Projected), above, Letter C-21.)
God bless you all and MERRY CHRISTMAS!
1/2 fl oz (1 tbsp) rum
They get me settled in a room (8-8:30pm) and by this point my sister in law arrives after working two 12 hr days in a row. Thank you Kris!! They break my water and asked about an epidural. I was trying to have a med free birth but "S" decided that he wasnt up for that. After an hour of horrible pain in my head from the fact he was sitting on a nerve and every contraction would shoot up to my brain I decided that an epidural was needed. They started placement at 9:15 and completed it at 9:30. Right after it kicked in "S's" heart rate dropped which in my case is a tell tale sign that delivery is not far off at all.
this is from her momma...
Higher, higher, now love comes
“We’ve already been granted money for Death Aversion Research,” Dr. Landice informed TJI. “Ultimately, we hope to overcome the limitations of Living in order to conquer Dying. Of course, we’ll have to use aggressive research techniques. Life has shown itself to be a tough nut to crack. Once you kill it, it tends to slip away. But it can’t run forever,” Dr. Landice accentuates this remark with a definitive fist clenching. “One day, we’ll back Life into a corner. Then all of its secrets will be granted to us. We will no longer fear Death.”
He was here when we moved in.
A short note to state that I have received a letter from Brit Writers’ solicitors requesting that I remove all references to the BWA from this website. I have therefore done so. I request that all Word Clouders refrain from mentioning the BWA in any way on this site. Any new posts or comments will be removed.
-Ross Murray, Montreal Gazette, 1991
The past couple days have been pretty warm for February in Ohio...which has inspired me to look towards spring, even though it's completely possible that there will be 5" of snow on the ground at this time next month.
fiction story book about the Underground Railroad. Her stories, articles, and book reviews have been published in over 100 print and online publications. Donna has three more books under contract with Guardian Angel Publishing, Hockey Agony, Powder Monkey, and A Sandy Grave. She writes, moms and is the Editor-in-Chief for Guardian Angel Kids, Publicist for the Working Writer’s Club, and owner of Author PR Services.
There are two other Romney recommendations that I endorse – (1) exploding medical costs can be contained only when incentives for overtreatment are reversed, and (b) a tax-swap involving (a) a carbon-oil tax and (b) other offsetting tax reductions (such as reducing income tax rates) has great potential for reducing our energy dependence on foreign oil.
Peak Organic
The initial claim here is that growth is necessary to do away with poverty and inequality; growing the economy means that each and every one of us will see their share of wealth increases as GDP grows overtime. Let us consider a Couscous-filled plate as an analogy to illustrate this claim;
But I would be living in the Caribbean so how bad could that be?
This Thursday 9/23, 6-8pm – Form and Content of Writing with Thea Liberty Nichols, Patrice Connolly, Claudine Ise, Abraham Ritchie & Bert Stabler - Panelists will engage in a casual discussion that examines the form (newsprint, published monographs, online journals or blogs) and content (criticism, interviews, exhibition reviews, press releases or scholarly essays) of their writing. Their individual practices, including the texts that inform and inspire them, will be examined alongside the colleagues and organizations with which they collaborate. In conjunction with Studio Chicago, the ways in which their studio environment, and indeed the city itself, contextualizes their practice will also be explored.
- I was clearing a backlog: 2 of these are library books, but the rest are review copies. None from my shelves this month.
Plug g = 1.27 into the efficiency equation above, assume rv = 10, and you get h = 0.46. Multiply this by about 0.75 to account for real cycle effects (such as the time it takes to burn, heat losses to the coolant, and exhaust valves that open before the piston fully reaches bottom position) and you have h = 0.35. This is the efficiency (given above) of using the chemical energy of the fuel to push the pistons. Multiply this by the mechanical efficiency of the engine, which accounts for the mechanical friction in the engine and for the air (and fuel) pumping work that has to be done, and you have the final, or overall efficiency of the engine. Of course the mechanical efficiency varies with driving conditions. The higher the RPM of the engine, the greater the friction loss. The more closed the throttle (ie, the farther your foot is off the pedal), the higher the pumping loss. For typical US driving, the resultant overall efficiency of the engine is about 20%. Note, your pedal is not really a gas pedal, it is an air pedal! Add the tranny and real axle mechanical friction losses (or the transaxle friction losses), loss due to convert reciprocal movement of piston to rotary motion for the wheel and the drain of a few essential accessories, and you arrive at a 15% fuel-to-wheel efficiency for the typical auto driven in the US.
The dialogue and plot are fast paced. There are no cheesy moments and no cringe-worthy speeches. Despite this being a serious, compelling and at times disturbing dystopian novel the book has light-hearted moments that bring a genuine smile to your face. It is nice to not be bombared with darkness all the time.
Remember that when you go to work and there’s that certain co-worker who drives you crazy.
Well, the silly season will soon be upon us - the shops are already gearing up, with crackers and cards and wrapping paper. It's only October and yet we've started the big count-down.
H & P's artwork: My mother has been an art teacher for a very long time and now she has the opportunity to work with her grandchildren on an almost daily basis with various medium. I love seeing the progress they are making in their use of color and complex lines they're drawing and I love the pride emanating from them after they finish a piece.
"I said it's not her mother!" I could feel my anger almost returning.
He told me he was thrilled to get my text message! He asked about Clint, and told me that he was amazed at how the house was coming along. He asked me about Brian, and spoke about how much he was wandering, before he enlisted, and what a strong young man he is now. He told me that he used to be a radio announcer, and he did a fun "bit" for me, so that I would hear his "real" voice. He explained to me that he was fine; he's "pragmatic," he said, and it was just his time to go. "You sound exactly as I imagined you would," he told me.
Linking up with Yeah Write this week.
Here is our new family member... Murphy.... and yes, I can't just say Murphy... I have to add on. I've been making him Irish... Murphy O'Neal.... Carly on the other hand has been calling him Murphy Brown... he is NOT a girl!!!
TV / Anything plastic / Anything cordless (which is usually plastic anyway) / Central heating / Scanners, printers or photocopiers / Microwave ovens / Anything digital / Computers and for me, at least...electricity.
Ages: 2 and up (all ages welcome)
The Kensington Chronicles by Lori Wick – This is the first historic book series that I read cover to cover in a four-day time span. I devoured those books and fell in love with the characters.
Anthony Mason, for the record, on the Beach Boys. No American band has more top 40 hits. Brian Wilson, Al Jardine, and Mike Love are the three remaining original members of the Beach Boys. Re-united in February at the Grammys. Grammy nomination for Good Vibrations, but beaten out in 1969 by Monday, Monday. Opening Day at Dodger Stadium, celebrating its 50th anniversary. Band formed in Hawthorne, CA. Four Freshmen harmony over Chuck Berry guitar licks. Surfin' Safari released in 1962. Murray Wilson was abusive to his kids. Brian Wilson and Mike Wilson fired him. Brian Wilson was emotional heart of the Beach Boys. "Being scared" is driving force in my life. Mike Love talked about drugs being a divisive influence. In 1965, Beatles' Rubber Soul. This led Beach Boys to "God Only Knows," termed by McCartney the greatest song ever written. The Beach Boys did not like Brian's Smile album. Dennis and Carl Wilson died. "How does a 70 year old sound that good?" You can let the past screw with your head for a lifetime, or you can focus on right now.
Hey Ladies! If you're anything like me, I am HORRIBLE when it comes to creating crafts on my own! But I do like to *surf* the internet and find fun craft ideas to copy-cat.
My voting card for the referendum has arrived, and with less than 4 weeks to go I thought I'd better blog about it.
Somewhat shiny for some reason, and a bit over-done around the edges, but it tasted DIVINE and Sonshine and I ate it all in three days.
Since I knew I was going to dye all this yarn as a single batch, I didn't need to be quite as careful about measuring the dyes. I don't need to duplicate the color later. I decided to start with Vermillion (I use Jacquard acid dyes), which is already a dark red, and add some Sapphire Blue to give it a purple tone. For no reason other than that it seemed about right, I mixed four parts Vermillion with one part Blue. This made a really pretty berry color, but I wanted something darker. I added one part Jet Black, and the result looked pretty good, so I went with that.
WARNING The article contains a couple spoilers about last night's 'Mad Men' on AMC. If you're a fan of the show, come back once you're watched the episode. But these posts are about a specific element of New York history from the 1960s and can be read even by those who don't watch the show at all. You can find other articles in this series here.
Mr. Jeh Johnson and General Carter Ham will no doubt give us that time
…THERE IS A SLGT RISK OF SVR TSTMS CNTRL/NRN PLAINS SEWD INTO THE MID MS AND OH VALLEYS…
about 10 -12 peeled raw king prawns, defrosted if frozen
And she’ll keep her house
Your husband: India Pale Ale is just the right thing for this gift. It tells him that he has a sense of adventure, knows what a good beer tastes like, and carries with it the image of the real he-man.
Part of this addiction means I have to stock up on fabrics and notions, there's no choice in this matter you understand. For a long while now I've wanted these heart, leaf and flower pins, but never got round to getting any. Yesterday I finally pressed yes please in etsy. If you pop on over to That Crafty Fish you'll find she has a few etsy shops selling all sorts of lovelies to tempt you like I was.
Tonight, I had a glass of a Galician blend -- spicy and fruity, but not too sweet -- that suited my palate, long ago trained on Spanish wines, just fine. It eventually came with an unorthodox lesson in stemware from our dear bartender: Sip the same wine from the bulbous bowl of a Burgundy glass and from the longer, leaner Bordeaux glass, and you will taste a difference. Science meets poetry as the voluptuous bowl brings out the more 'feminine' floral notes in wine, while the slender glass accentuates the the spicier, more forward 'masculine' tones. These are the kinds of lessons you learn at Bar Covell: it's enough to make a lady blush! (I mean, not really. Well, maybe some ladies would blush, but who would want to drink wine with those squares anyway.)
“I never know what to do with my hands,” she said.
07.The Beast Within
Little breezes dusk and shiver
Into the conclusion of the realistic idea,
Stephen D. Bechtel, Jr.
TSA agents have been deployed to shake down Americans at everywhere from bus depots, to ferry terminals, to train stations, in one instance conducting pat downs of passengers, including children, who had already completed their journey when arriving in Savannah.
St (chuckling): Oh, no! You can't remember. That doesn't sound good.
I don't think the parents minded,
could not stop drinking it all day long.
Total spent $43.25 plus ~$7.50 gas for 45 miles of driving, for a total cost of $50.75.
The instrumentation is violin, pocket trumpet, bass and drums. Plus some extra flute work from Don Cherry and Bang himself. The timbre of the unusual combination of instruments is absorbing - and the playing excellent.
I read this post recently, by a grown unschooler who states that "many grown homeschoolers are wide-ranging academics on the side, but most people are not. That’s a problem."
But a lot of other stuff happened as well! Too much stuff to go back and list, really. So instead, I decided to go back and have a look at the list of not-quite-resolutions-but-something-like-them for 2011 and see what worked and what fell by the wayside.
When he says,
A driving school is offering its novice drivers the chance to take to the road in a Ferrari.
Ah, serendipity it is a wonderful phenomenon. So much so we don't give it it's due--but this am I say thank you to serendipitous moments. Through some wonderful renters for my apartment during South by Southwest, the gorgeous couple behind thinklove.com, I was introduced to Jack Heath, Founder of the Inspire Foundation.
Are you ready to play? If you would like to join us for this challenge, please link directly to your post (not just to your blog), using Inlinkz below. If you are uploading your project to an online gallery, please use keyword 4CCC-65 (eg: Splitcoaststampers, Paper Craft Planet, etc.)
(and it’s true, she did look awesome) “Yes?”
Kids have so much energy in the mornings.
They better pray fast. The warrant to execute the sentence has been sealed, and the grindstone is turning…
You’ve survived the perils of Demon’s Souls. You’re fighting your way through Dark Souls hell. And next year? Next year you’ll likely breeze through Yakuza: Dead Souls, the newly-renamed North American version of Yakuza of the End, as it is a completely unrelated product.
It appears to me that the Joie de Vivre is telling me that you need to stop blocking the joy from your own life. Be aware of how you think about certain things and this in turn will allow you the potential to adapt better to certain circumstances, which will result in a happier you.
A week before Christmas Emo boy declared all he wants for Christmas is an airplane. I was not about to spend another penny or brave the over trafficked stores, so Soldier boy went out to the garage and put this together with the Sensitive child.
8. Starlight Mints - Black Champagne (3:24)
It is sure to be a fantastic show featuring 28 classic rock tunes including “Don’t Stop Believin’”, “We Built This City”, “The Final Countdown”, “Wanted Dead or Alive”, “Here I Go Again”, “Harden My Heart”, “Can’t Fight this Feeling”, “Renegade” and “I Want To Know What Love Is”.
Stopping to buy piri piri (hot chilli sauce) at a roadside stall, only to have it explode like a roman candle when we open it at the table days later, drenching everyone and their food in red liquid spray.
that’s not good at all.
4. Dot on the letter “I” is called “title”.
Howza bout a fun little survey? I may pick the one that is most popular, on the survey, or I may not. We may choose an entirely different name, if one comes to us, but I would sure love to see what you all think of our (so far) 3 finalists:
I called his wreath "wintery wreath" because of its colours. :) What do you think? (I also made the bow on this). As I've said, this project is so easy and you can find a lot of instructions on the web.
Some code/ordinance changes can be simple and not impact the cost to rebuild too greatly; whereas, other changes can have a significant impact on rebuilding costs. For instance, in some cases even though your entire home isn’t destroyed by the fire, new building codes won’t permit you to rebuild a home with over 50% damage. So, if this were to happen – your insurance company would pay for the damaged portion of the debris removal and rebuild – YOU would be responsible for the debris removal and rebuild for the undamaged portion of your home that the city requires to be rebuilt due to code changes.
I’ve read that on Ultramarathons you should (stop and) take on board food… so I tried out mashed potatoes and oats last week… and although they were every cheap to make, they didn’t taste too good so I thought I’d try an energy bar or two. Mule bars have about 45g of carbs and 250 calories which I thought would be good to keep me going.
"Coward wrote the song while driving from Hanoi to Saigon "without pen, paper, or piano". "I wrestled in my mind with the complicated rhythms and rhymes of the song until finally it was complete, without even the aid of pencil and paper. I sang it triumphantly and unaccompanied to my travelling companion on the verandah of a small jungle guest house. Not only Jeffrey , but the gecko lizards and the tree frogs gave every vocal indication of enthusiasm"."
Mariage Frères has been my tea of choice since I started drinking tea in 2000. I was in Paris, trying to go off coffee (note to MP: just cause I did it once doesn't mean I'll do it again), so I took out books on tea from the American Library and learned something. Then I went to Mariage Frères to sniff their canisters. And that's really why I stayed with this boutique--they'd let me sniff however much I wanted, something that wasn't so common to find back then. Quickly I learned that I'm the "unsophisticated" type of tea drinker. Jasmine green tea is about as traditional as I get--I prefer flavors. All kinds of pretty flavors with pretty flower petals and fruits nestled within!
I’m a total tweet-twat.
I was really fighting with myself on this one, as I didn't think the vacuum should go with food.
The special report published this morning by the Central Bank of Ireland may well have perked up your spirits if you’re a homeowner inIreland. The Bank has calculated that residential property inIreland is between 12-26% undervalued – in other words you might think your home is worth €148,000 but the Bank thinks it should be worth up to €200,000. The Bank has even produced a graph – shown above – which shows the degree of undervaluation based on four different models.
"Whatever he does for you, suklian mo. But don't go over the top. Because if you go over the top, it means, you want something else," E explained. "To maintain a fake boyfriend relationship and friends in the future, everything must be equal. If you go on other dates, you let him know, and always ask 'Do u want to meet after? Or how was your day?'"
Therefore it all started …
It’s not the only thing I miss. I tend to be a very big-picture person, interested in grand cosmic patterns and trends, the kind of “If-a-tree-falls-in-a-forest” questions that can drive other people crazy.
Thanks for stopping by Today! Be sure and share this post by clicking the share buttons below! Have a terrific weekend!
These stories above are good and heartwarming and I am glad these ladies were able to get the closure they needed. At the same time, it is important to understand that in some cases these abusers do not grow up and outgrow this behavior. As I deal with adults who survived this peer abuse as children, I have met some who have been able to go back and get the apologies they deserved. However, this is not always the case and not all bullies grow up. Some grow a lot worse and it is important to understand this. I know of cases where these adults are traumatized once again when finding these abusers on Facebook or anywhere else. In one case, a female bully sent a friend request to her former target on Facebook. The former target confronted the bully and let her know how her behavior left a life long effect. Instead of apologizing, the abuser started stalking and harassing this person on Facebook. There are other stories, but due to privacy and confidentiality, I am not at liberty to say anything else. Since this article came out and was making its way through the blogosphere, I have read comments and found one former abuser state she felt horrible and wanted to apologize to her former target. Other than that I am finding over 98% of the comments to these blogs to disagree with these findings.
For more details, see The Moorings website - www.mooringsvillage.com (which really doesn't do the place justice). But in the meantime, here are some of my favourite scenes...
Don’t get me wrong, I need money to get by, the same as everyone else. But money has no eternal value. It is only good for life on this planet. I need to be storing up eternal wealth. That’s where righteousness comes in. It will last throughout the ages to come.
The monitoring teams also witnessed numerous acts of police brutality, such as assault of arrested persons. Instead of merely apprehending suspects, the attitude of the police was punitive in nature.
I suppose there’s still something to be said about holding a newspaper in your hands, rather than reading the news off a computer screen, Blackberry or any of the other fancy gidgets and gadjets that are available today. It can be, as suggested, quite comforting. But in terms of news, I’m afraid the print newspaper has gone the way of AM radio.
The preachers and pastors, I say, must impress this upon such disloyal people, with constant admonition and warning, for it is the truth, and it is needed. But if there are some who despise this exhortation and will not be moved by it, let them go on to the devil, as St. Paul had to let the Greeks, and St. Peter the Jews go; the others should not mind. Indeed, if it were to come to war, I would rather that none of these were under the emperor’s banner, or stayed under it, but were all on the Turk’s side; they would be beaten all the sooner and in battle they would do the Turk more harm than good, for they are out of favor with God, the devil, and the world, and are surely, all of them, condemned to hell. It is good to fight against such people, who are plainly and surely damned both by God and the world.
ruffles potato chips with sour cream and onion dip
And more even than simply inaccurate, I often find it rather insulting.
It’s also totally ok as well because I’ve already warned Brandon we’re probably going to give birth to a baby monkey. I mean ALL of my kids have inherited my hairiness.(Wow say that three times fast.) They are usually covered in hair from the top of their heads right down to their cute little tails…I mean tail bone. Heck some of them have even had cowlicks on their backs.
A couple of hours later I walked into a place to buy an empanada; ´What have you got without meat (sin carne)´, I asked. The bloke reacted immediately ´Pollo - ..´ ´No, no, soy vegetariana (with an apologetic smile)´ ´Ah... entonces (names several types of empanadas, ending with La Napoletana)´ I wanted to know what is in La Napoletana (I have learned to be wary); ´Jamon, queso, tomates.´ ´Qué?!´ not sure I really heard what I heard ´Jamon, queso, tomates´ he repeats patiently. ´Ah, no, yo quiero algo sin carne...´ ´Sí, claro (encouragingly).´ I have a moment of confusion, but then decide to be assertive ´Jamon, pero, es carne!´ He gives me an incredulous smile, and then it dawns on him ´Aaaaah.... Sí...´
I know you've been waiting for the thrilling conclusion to our two days of leisure. Well, wait no more!
Never really picking up the great matter, but really looking for the great answer.
“Come back, Tommy!”
The few that we managed to save, were served (nearly dry) to the sibs, with blackberry mint scones (just like the dandelion scones, but with 2 tablespoons of chopped fresh mint added to sour cream scones, patted out and cut into circles with a glass, and topped with a pressed in dollop of blackberry jam, before baking), and fresh mint tea (hot water poured right over the mint leaves in the tea pot, with sugar to taste)...
11. Telephone Skills: How to Hang Up
4. April Camden Doll – Natural Waldorf Doll The idea of a Waldorf doll, well expressed here and here, is to have a doll that is soft and lovely to the senses, and whose expression (or lack thereof) allows the child to assign it any mood that fits the situation. No pasted smiles, no hard edges.
With all our diversities apparent and hidden
The sale was a great success. We had 20 artists selling their work. Everything from pottery to weaving, fabric "paintings", decorated gourds, jewelry, and more. We were a part of the Grove Park/Ravenwood Garden Tour and had about 125 people visit our artists.
-Wanna come take a Copics class with me? My next classes will be in Baltimore, Montreal Canada, and Connecticut---all the info is up at www.cmcroad.com or you can email me if you have questions.
that my own little world is not about me
“Either you honor all or none,” Kaji said. “How can you draw a line based on survivability? They’ve effectively eliminated 95% of all the affected students.”
It's time to take a step back!
TINSA have released house price figures for January and they show another fall in prices, although more moderate than before.
4. Humor
“This captivating, emotional production will make you want to hug your family and friends and dance the night away. Highly recommended!”
and goddamn it, i think he means it.
2. More concerned in showing how clever he / she is
We shot in the studio against black and white backgrounds and spent a pleasant afternoon chatting and general getting Krissi to relax in front of the camera again. Once she had become more comfortable, and she had seen some of the initial pictures on the viewfinder on the camera, we set about getting some lovely shots of her.
That's huge. HUGE.
I was surprised and very touched to be nominated for the Versatile Blogger Award by Infernal Deity of a Psychotic Mind, a blogger with great taste in delicious men and all things beautiful. My blog meanders through my random thoughts, muses and ideas and it is humbling to think that my words mean anything to anyone beyond myself.
The Single Judge convened a meeting with the Victims Participation and Reparations Section and other involved Registry personnel to discuss the manner of victim participation in the pre-Trial phase of the proceedings.[23] The Single Judge then ordered the beginnings of a “collective” system of victim representation.
If you’ve gotten this far and have your heightmap in the game, congratulations. You’re one of the selected few. You are Dragonborn. But then you’ll want to add distant land to this as well, because all you see at this point is the near vicinity of your character. read the pages on CreationKit.com about how to generate distant land. The descriptions there are pretty good and to the point.
God's Law is timeless.
After you've completed the circuit, unscramble the words as you proceed through the Scavenger Hunt. When you're finished, fill out the contest entry form here.
The cultural experience I had so badly longed for before was now right at my doorsteps. I could see myself developing a completely different social life and having more diverse networks than ever before. Just going to the gym, which was two minutes away, and attending all of their different classes felt simply good. My dream of living in an area that was in New York but did not necessarily feel like New York seemed to have come true. At the same time I did not feel threatened when returning home late at night. That was before word had spread on several instances of rape and molestation around 5th Avenue. Today I still feel safe in the neighborhood, though.
Some other time, huh? How many OTHER secrets is Kent hiding? Stealing Wonder Woman's panties? Putting Ben-Gay in Batman's Bat-cup? Loosening the top to the salt shaker in the JLA-feteria?
Pink sequined sweater, Moda International. Black lace shirt, Newport News. Hot pink tank and gray flannel pants, Express. Ugly black boots, LifeStrides.
Cops: Dad Brought Child to Robbery Watch Video
"American Pie" by Don McClean
Dear oh dear, the scam merchants really are scraping the bottom of barrel these days.
On Thursday April 22nd, from 4:30 to 6pm, one of the biggest rock stars of the craft beer world will be hanging out at CBX to meet beer enthusiasts and sign bottles/growlers along with his book "Brewing Up A Business" which will be available at CBX for a discounted price! Sam Calagione is the Founder and President of Dogfish Head Craft Brewed Ales as well as a highly acclaimed craft beer author and media presence. Our growler station will be loaded with Dogfish Head beers for Sam to offer up his unique specialties and talk shop about his creations. We'll have some Dogfish goodies to giveaway too! See you there!
My own worst enemy? Yes I am. I have set standards for myself that I can’t reach. I feel I must be perfect in everything I say or do or it won’t matter to say anything at all. I rather keep quiet than risk saying anything silly or meaningless. Yet the times when I break free from these standards and manage to speak without thinking too much about what to say or worry about what I’m saying are the happiest times of my life. The times I always miss when I have thrown myself back into the darkness of my own prison and got caught up by thoughts about not being good enough, perfect enough. Feeling worthless, small and inferior in every way possible.
Wyatt on the other hand is my little independent man.
Raffaello, Tiziano, Beato Angelico, Tintoretto, Rubens, Goya, Velazquez, Bosch ..... it was a delight for the eyes and a solace for the soul to see all their masterpieces with my own eyes!
3 bound
And the pump right in the kitchen! And the city! city! city! –
I love using lace on just about everything I create be it paper, fabric, mixed media. I use quite a bit of heirloom lace in my art projects that I purchase online. I don’t find it very often here when I am out antiquing. Chemical lace is my favorite of all the vintage/antique laces. If I am using lace on a fabric project, I find sewing the lace on in layers achieves the best results (and little frustration). For paper/cardstock, I used the good old sewing machine. In mixed media projects, I use a combination of E6000 and Matte Gel Medium.
Me (rather sarcastically): "Oh, what might cause a luggage delay here? The baggage handlers haven't gone on strike have they?"
In the process of becoming giddy about life…ALL the time! Recharged. Re-energized. Radiant. Yup, happy being me with all my foibles. Focusing on health, lifestyle, spirit, and all that intangible goodness!
In among all this foolishness is an ovarian cyst I have been dealing with since Easter. I hope it resolves soon. Standard medical advice says to wait 4 weeks before contacting the doctor. I really don't want to deal with yet another round of medical testing.
We are people who will endure season after season of disappointment because we know in the end, there is a love that will find a way and a love that will not be broken. No chicane will stand. Love wins. And season after season of disappointment will not disuade us from believing.
One of the long-running themes of this blog is how the marketing and advertising world have lost touch with reality .
David Sylvian & R. Sakamoto Bamboo houses UK
The park has rustic cabins, most built by the Civilian Conservation Corps in the 1930s. We have our own favorite cabin perched on the edge of the mountaintop with a wonderful view of the valley below. We can enjoy beautiful sunsets without leaving the deck of the cabin.
Grubbs recruited by Jim O'Rourke to compose the single 20 Songs Less (Teen Beat, 1993) and the acoustic Crookt Crackt Or Fly (Drag City, 1994). Both are radical works, although of different kinds. The latter is, first and foremost, a study of guitar deconstruction. The 13-minute Work From Smoke squeezes a pastoral ballad between dissonant flamenco picking and the country-raga fantasy of a drunk John Fahey, which then fades into free-jazz jamming for the subconscious. Every Five Miles is an even more abstract stream of consciousness, in which the guitar is consistently plucked at the limit between harmony and noise, the tempo is ever changing, and the tones get harsher and harsher. The longest piece, The Wrong Soundings
I had intended to stitch a cushion cover for it.. THEN at ... Ikea I remembered!
- Way you glide along on that ice you’re like a falcon in flight. – I said, right in his ear.
passage today? How do you picture Jesus as he prays? What does this say to
I also like the Knockout Tournament they are giving us, and now it seems Velvet Sky has moved on to Bound for Glory for the Knockout Title against Winter. Velvet Sky is my choice to win the title.
We had a little pep talk. I showed him that I actually had, in all of my motherly wisdom, saved a few things I knew he might want to play with in the future (despite his insistence, at the time, that he wanted every single toy gone so he wouldn’t have to ever clean his room again!) and the sacks remained in the car.
“Katie.” Ted looked down at Katie’s hand still clenching his arm. Katie let go and dropped her hand to her sides.
The introduction of Hot Wheels was a revolution in diecast toy cars. Any track that had a start and a finish to it, inevitably saw the Hot Wheels cars fly through the end and onto the floor. By 1970 the time had come to try slowing these cars down. Real world funny cars and dragsters use parachutes. Why not Hot Wheels?
Can someone explain to me what the hell is this cuz it looks like it and it makes me sick, How can u be attracted to your own brother/Family?
I will choose to engage in activities that enriches my life and the life of those around me.
Also, how do you have more money in your pocket? Work. You slug your way out, climb up the corporate ladder, do plenty of OTs, just to earn a few more bucks. By the time you get home, you’ll be too tired to have a proper bonding session with your children. Having kids and seeing them only a few hours each day and two full days is not going to help bond the kid with the parents.
4. What do you think could be done to better promote Australian authors either at home or abroad (or both)?
Drag: Do you work on your own?
An investigation into IDT by the Consumerist highlighted the background of several of the sales reps for IDT in multi-level marketing, and some similar sales tactics to those used in multi-level marketing. But IDT, as far as I could tell, paid people commission for getting people to sign up to its service and that was that.
Journal of Intellectual Property Law & Practice (2012), doi: 10.1093/jiplp/jps005, first published online: January 30, 2012
Each person reading this can probably think about things that have happened in their lives that have changed them: whether it was seeing a friend experience a hardship, losing someone they love, dealing with a crisis in their life, or having a positive eye-opening experience. Each person reading this can think of who in their life has helped to shape who they are: whether it is parents, siblings, friends, or other people who have walked into their life. Each person reading this can think of something they have learned: whether in the classroom, from a deep conversation, or from experiencing something that taught them a lesson. It is these things that we carry with us, that affect who we are. And everyone is different.
i have been given some lovely chook related gifts..too good to use french hen shaped soap and eggs, hand embroidered rooster serviettes and an antique white milk glass hen on nest dish..and recently i found a pottery hen on nest dish at the op shop which i blogged about here..
People are getting very passionate about losing paper and cardboard. Get over it. For us it’s what’s on the pages that count. If you buy a crap novel, the traditional book suddenly doesn’t look so nostalgic.
7. William is VERY stubborn. If he doesn’t want to do something, he pretty much won’t.
Maybe I’m missing something here? Maybe it’s because I sit here looking at my shorts and the stomach that sticks out over them (yes – I should probably go and invest in some proper maternity wear now instead of wearing my regular shorts without doing them up)…
What were Richard III's last words?
Happy Gilmore mixes a lot of vulgar sex jokes and slapstick humor with some incredibly absurd elements. It is the absurdity which saves the film. His grandmother is trapped in a slave labor nursing home run by the hilariously sinister unaccredited Ben Stiller playing the mustache twirling villain to a tee. The famous fist fight with bob barker is the biggest highlight, but it is followed closely by Gilmore’s ’Happy place” featuring the lovely Julie Bowen in her underwear.
Features: Buddha Puja, Vipassana Meditation, Photo Exhibition, Buddha Prabachan, Visit Lumbini Year 2012 Promotion, Sports , blood donation and more
1/4 cup cocoa
But hell what do I know. Chime in!
Now that I have seen my true reflection, I need to throw out the broken mirror!
"The other day, we all went out as a family," she e-mailed me. "After lunch, Ava fell asleep, so I knew of a house close by where I already had permission to pick the oranges and lemons. Daddy sat in the car and read a book. Ava slept. And, I picked 50 pounds of fruit! It was easy. It's always thrilling when I meet new people and they are so kind and generous. That is what makes the world a better place."
Friday night I had the opportunity to participate in a card class my friend Emily was having. We had so much fun! I enjoy getting to chat with others plus see what fabulous things they are creating!
Grinding against him, Caleb increased the friction by sneakily letting his free hand feel up Gislenus’s toned body. “Fuck.“
Being her friend could be fun too. A typical walk in the park became a colorful narrative of the incompetent idiots in her life, who didn’t recognize her potential. Or some boy who she was teasing, but wasn’t really interested in dating. Or some boy shes dating who isnt giving her the kind of relationship she needs. Or that girl across the sidewalk, whose outfit looked like it had been picked out by a blind orangutan.
Sense of the Readership
This, this: no more, you gods! your present kindness
That’s me. That is my identity. So is it ok for large companies to use my identity against me? To use my interests, place of residence and habits to formulate an advertisement strategy targeted at me? First, I honestly think that notion is a bit creepy, but I do think it’s ok given that the company goes about it legally. Look at it this way; we interact with people based on their identity, their interests, likes, dislikes, locations and certain habits such as driving habits. Creating an advertisement strategy based on me is the only way the company as a whole can interact with me. There is no way the company can interact with me face to face or personally over the internet through conversational e-mail. So what can they do? Do me a service. They log what I buy and often I buy it. This lets them help me by giving me coupons for what I buy the most. CVS does this for me with their Extra Care card and I think it’s great. Instead of getting coupons for things I never buy I get coupons for thing I do buy and items related to my regular list. Yes, companies knowing where we live, what we buy, how many credit cards we have and have much we make is on the creepy side. But it’s kind of creepy because they are plugged into parts of our identity. So why are we spooked when a company knows so much when this is the information we readily give to people we know and people we want to know? I give my e-mail out to my family and friends, my parents know what bank I have an account with, my family and friends have my number, Amazon.com knows my mailing address for packages and Linked In , Facebook, and Twitter know what college I go to. We have the choice to not give out our information. The problem is, by not giving out information online we limit our social networks. How many of you could go without your Facebook, Twitter, Amazon or iTunes accounts?
Ethan: I don't know.
I finally managed to get this last card in before the deadline yesterday. I'm just posting now as time is precious for me these days as I'm looking after our move for next month. So much to do and such little time to do it! LOL
The Brentwood Gazette reported the council turned down the demolition plan because the house is of “considerable architectural merit and makes a positive contribution to the character and appearance of the Conservation Area”.
Hops are used to offset malt sweetness, but in Adam's case, a pronounced smokiness in the nose and palate aid the cause. Sally commented on the hop intensity, but I found it more serene--a burnishing of the plummy malt. I don't recall the smoke being this strong. In my memory, it's more plums and chocolate with just an undercurrent of smoke. HotD now uses all-organic malt, and this may be part of the explanation. The nature of the beer is unchanged, but the emphasis has shifted.
They will use whatever they can against us, and as we now know, nothing is too low for them.
I had never dreamed of being a full-time, long-term, stay-at-home mother but have always dreamed of marriage to anyone of any sex or gender presentation who I was compatible enough with, that I could partner my abilities and resources with to sustain a lifelong commitment and family. And, I didn’t always think of this desire as one of economic value or as a safety net in case of emergency, nor did I look for partners that I could trust to offer me either. Instead, naively, until recently, I thought of this contract as one signed with love based on what I assumed (bias) was an “innate” desire for coupling. Of course, it is worth noting, I was raised to believe it was a binding contract and sacrament willed and sanctioned by “God,” and that any non-hetero impulse was sinful and to be suppressed etc.
Expect more of the same over the coming week to 10 days.
They will flit from one beautiful flower to another for the sheer pleasure of the uniqueness of who they are there, at that moment,
* a piece of cheesy-garlic bread wrapped in a napkin from dinner last night
Is it our past that fuels us
So there I was applying my black, water-proof mascara, it has to be water-proof, I cry when I laugh and as I’m always laughing, do I need to say anymore… when I noticed that the bottom ones are longer than the top. Not just a little bit longer either. I wouldn’t say that they were long, the bottom ones, just that they are longer than the top.
Bob and I celebrated our 45th Wedding Anniversary on August 14.
The medical director became aware of Mary's heroic act and he
Before the visit, our clients doubted whether they had the capacity to start new activities, but after seeing how successful their peers have been, they said, “Now that we have seen them do it, we know we can do it too! And, we are ready to start!” Seeing really is believing.
However, the good news is that this ridiculous law does not apply to drinking; the Paladar has a most extensive and inviting selection of rum, which you can while away your evening with in the bar or in the restaurant.
Stay tuned for a brand new trailer and an upcoming crowd funding pitch to get the ball rolling on the sequel! =)
The recipe calls for a 10 inch round cake pan with three inch sides. I couldn’t find one in Williams Sonoma when I was at the Mall of America the last time, so I started looking online for ideas. I came across a video from Chef Marcela Valladolid from Food Network, where she made basically the same cake in a Bundt pan. Excellent idea!
Crayon Sourcils Sculpting Eyebrow Pencil
1. They like to flirt and when you caught them they can tell you that they are naturally flirty. They will tell you that they flirt with all their friends too and it means “nothing” for them.. for this boys flirting is harmless and acting it is different. awh sounds awful!
The Iranian-supported Shi’ite terrorist group Hezbollah has spread its influence all the way to the U.S. border with Mexico, a House Foreign Affairs Committee hearing on Iran’s influence in the Western Hemisphere heard on Thursday.
I do believe that I will buy this piece before I leave New Mexico or one of the others I showed you here.
16This is what all the meeting of the people of the Lord has said, What is this wrong which you have done against the God of Israel, turning back this day from the Lord and building an altar for yourselves, and being false to the Lord?
Two and a half centuries ago, Calisto Terana lost everything when a zealous priest murdered the woman he loved. Now, desperate for another chance to love her, he wants redemption for the mistake that cost her life.
have in me the yeast of greatness! Greater is He that is in me than he that is
Daniel 9:9–To the Lord our God belong mercy and forgiveness, though we have rebelled against Him.
Nifty to remain range bound between 5500 – 5300
6. Bathroom Etiquette II: His Razor is His
The tactic, which attacks fundamental civil liberties in the students’ host countries, has provoked outrage amongst academics and politicians in both Britain and America. Today, Tom Greatrex MP, a Member of the All-Party Parliamentary Group on Malaysia, said:
At Phaedo 93a-94e Socrates is responding to a kind of materialist theory suggested by Simmias. Simmias acknowledges that Socrates can raise difficulties for the identification of the soul with the body by pointing out apparently metaphysical differences between them (for example with the argument from “recollection,” which is Socrates’ term of art for innate knowledge), but Simmias argues that the soul might nonetheless be a kind of “attunement” of the body. This is an emergentist view: when all of the physical properties come together in the right way, a non-physical property emerges, not identical to but dependent on (caused by) the underlying physical properties. Emergentism is a creature of that murky area, populated by refugees and smugglers, where “non-reductive materialism” and “epistemological dualism” share a hopelessly porous border. People who wind up here wanted the goodness of materialism without the badness. Plato’s (dualist) response to the emergentist challenge provides the last link in my argument for a Platonic resolution (I don’t say “solution”) to the problem of rationality.
About this time John and Ashton showed up. Ashton was my cheerleader for 3 of my 4 games, giving me great advise like “why didn’t you move up to shoot those Thunder Wolves?”. All my opponents were great and even though I only won one game, it was a great way to spend a Saturday morning.
― Mahatma Gandhi
Is not the porch of spirits lingering.
When we ate dinner at their home Aunt Becky would ask as dinner was ending how many cups of coffee would each person enjoy after dinner. Then she would disappear into the kitchen. When I was older I invited myself back to the kitchen to watch the preparation. The best I recall she mixed one tablespoon of coffee per cup into a well beaten egg mixture. Then she set it in a pot and it steeped. She used a fine tea strainer to keep the grounds out of the coffee and poured a deep amber liquid that made coffee an art form in her home.
Flander's Poppy
Floor: Gift wrapping supplies. And an EMPTY tub!!
Among the many varieties of Gluten-free Pastas, Cookies, Cake Mixes, I saw a bag of Gluten-free Brown Rice Flour! Yes, this would be an excellent exchange for regular white flour. With the little amount I needed for this Latke Recipe, I purchased the Brown Rice Flour and began the process of preparing Potato Latkes as usual.
I'm even more impressed because I had so much drama with work and interviews and orientations and money. It's been a stressful month. And it was definitely a struggle to post every single day.
I am honestly in awe of these people. If you throw out the fact that most of the girls look like they need a hamburger or three hundred, the cost to produce the clothes could feed a small country, and in the real world what you put on your head shouldn't matter as much as what's in it... it is pretty amazing.
Next time I have a sofa I need to get rid of I’m just going to leave it lying in the street.
Africa Today with Walter Turner
That night I got super crampy and just 'knew' the end to this horrendous cycle was coming the next day. So, I got up the next day and did not take a test like I said I would. To be honest, it was mostly because I forgot, since I was running late for work that day. Lindsey, my boss, picked me up and we headed to the first house. It took all of about four seconds for her to notice I wasn't my normal self. I was quite hyped up, everytime I checked facebook I would burst out into some loud, obnoxious rant about how just utterly ridiculous someone's post was. And then, I posted my own status. It said something to the effect of "If you're pregnant, stop whining about it. After all, there is a little miracle in your belly." Pretty sure it was less direct than that, but you get the point.
Just to let you know what’s happening with us…
I missed his 10 month old post altogether - mostly because I was in Montreal celebrating my 30th birthday but is that really an excuse? :) What I would have said in that post is that is got two teeth and has only bitten me a few times. That he is saying "mama" and "dada/papa" and waving. But all that's old news now.
Some dogs with hip dysplasia do well with weight control and pain medication as they get older. As mentioned in a previous Pet Points article, pain drugs should be given only with precautions. Human drugs can be dangerous when given to animals. Also, side effects can include irritation to both the stomach and intestine or liver and kidney damage. Blood testing is required prior to starting medication and monitoring is necessary when using pain medication.
Excellent Betty MacDonald Fan Club literature and outstanding art support us to see the positive aspects of life.
Loki: I have an army.
I had a package of 20 Halloween pencils laying around the house and thought it would be fun to make some pencil toppers for these and give them to the various small children of my family and friends. I completed the pencils and then made little treat bags with the pencils, some straws, a little bit of candy, erasers and other fun stuff like that. I will post the picture later of all of the bags. Here are the pencils for now.
Forest, the smokers’ lobby group which runs the Hands Off Our Packs campaign, says that government consultations on tobacco are not public consultations but “public sector consultations” because public money and public sector workers are used to mobilise support for further tobacco control measures.
This pie recipe, unlike many, does not need to be stored in the refrigerator.
It’s about environmental degradation, science, our dependence on plastic, the consequences of our attitudes towards the earth. The main character, who narrates the story of his return to the land in rural Nova Scotia as well as a past life spent in New York City in a lab, tends his garden, detached from the catastrophes going on in greater society. We learn, early on, that the world is collapsing because of the loss of certain plastics. The radio news reports that
Next I was on the hunt for some new drawer pulls and handles. I was just browsing at Home Depot and came across these pulls that I really liked. They were only $2.99 per pull, which was inexpensive, but since I had to buy 8, I knew it would add up quick. The door handles were only $3.49 per piece (I got 2). Andres helped me measure the drawers so that I would get them exactly in the middle, and then we drilled the holes. A little while later we were able to screw in all the pulls and bring it inside!
Got a low, low feeling around me
Thanks for visiting with me today , Im wishing that all your dreams come true someday soon and until we meet again ..Ill always be ...just a lil raggedy angie!hugs!
the lack of plastic containers of many kinds has fuelled a drastic shortage of blood for surgeries in most hospitals. Authorities attribute this primarily to the loss of plastic collection bags and tubing. The dissolution of these and many other plastics has authorities baffled . . . . Blackouts continue to plague most cities as the coating on high-volate power lines is dissolving or being eaten. The nylon in gas tanks is being digested from the outside and people are finding their cars standing in puddles of gas (43).
So, this is my first ever post on WordPress and to start with, I need to apologise to you all for that somewhat intimidating picture of the UKIP leader. But on the eve of the Local Council elections, it’s only fair that Nigel Farage gets a shout or two.
Obey City – Work Move
Phone: 309/371-0473
Rafael Gil: The US Treasury gave millions to the banks. The US is helping banks meanwhile they are laying people off. Bank of America plans to lay off 30,000 people. The CEOs are getting bonuses and the banks are foreclosing on people’s homes. A lot of people go to school and play by the book. If you would fast forward their lives 20 or 30 years down the road, many are facing massive debt and homelessness today.
There's a rat-a-tat-tat coming from the trees across the valley, the sound of a woodpecker doing whatever it is that woodpeckers do. The fluffy clouds are tinged with pink and the outlines of two of Dorset's highest points, Pilsdon and Lewesdon - known by sailors and locals as The Cow and The Calf - are sharp and clear against the morning sky.
BY THE PALE MOONLIGHT is going to go up for sale on October 18th!!! That's only --9-- days from now!!! WHOOT WHOO!!!
After realizing there is no way I could hike up to the fire pit in the snow, carrying Owen with his snow suit on, and lug an oxygen tank behind us... I decided to take the stroller. Thank goodness for our super baby jogger deluxe.. it cruised over most of the snow! It was also nice to keep the stroller at a far distance from the fire pit... darn oxygen.
Oddly enough it wasn’t too big a struggle to get the boys to bed after that, and as they settled down, we caught up with Mum, Dad and Colin.
it's a "Big Busted" girl thing........... ( lest you judge... walk a mile in my bra cups......)
However Precedence has it
1 T olive oil
Not that it matters anyway. I'm cock-a-hoop about them regardless, and I'm looking forward to exploiting them to the full for the forthcoming TinTrunk website, not to mention flyers, business cards, signs, badges, banners, fridge magnets, coffee mugs, t-shirts, mousemats - blimey, there's so much potential!
This fel dabbling did indeed arouse the interest of the Burning Legion once more, and the Blood Elves served these evil masters much like the Drow serve Lloth. The problem with masters of a chaotic nature is these beings tend to revel in conflict and destruction more than the prosperity of their followers. Sargeras is not as interested in followers as he is in destroying every world and living thing created by the Titans. The Blood Elves were too lost in their addiction to realize the evil they unleashed upon the world and willingly served.
AWA has a variety of events, including video rooms, a dealers room, costume contest, panels, workshops, an artist alley, and a formal ball.
Not only did I improve my writing I also got to spend time with other people
He said, “Throw your net on the right side of the boat and you will find some” (Jn. 21:6a).
Me likey, trust you do too.
My eldest son has just persuaded me to try playing 'Lord of the Rings' online, so I may not be doing so much crafting if I get addicted to it. To be honest, I really need something to keep my mind occupied at the moment as it stops me thinking of all the things that could go wrong with our house move!
"You're on a plan with THAT handset."
“The swastika is shorthand for every racist and bigot on the planet,” Rabbi Cooper said. “It is amazing that 60 or 70 years later that symbol has not lost any of its potency.”
Using scraps of the yellow paper, I punched out a lot of small flowers and layered them up to make the smaller flowers. The larger flowers were in the goody bag, to which I added some green glitter as a highlight. In the centre of each flower is a gold gem.
Here he is getting
Really....
04. Unspoken
Optoma HD70 Home Projector Review – Affordable Home Theater Projection
From the data, it appears that a substantial defense to infringement is the single best way to defeat a willfulness claim. The low odds ratio for this factor (0.121) suggest that an accused infringer is several times less likely to be found willful if it can establish that it had a substantial or credible defense to the patentee's infringement claim. Specifically, when a substantial defense existed, willfulness was found only 13% of the time (5 of 40 cases), compared to 57% of the time when no substantial defense was found (55 of 96 cases).217 This relationship is highly statistically significant (p = .000).
It makes me sad to see the two countries drifting apart. No, not on the forums – they don’t matter that much (sorry to burst your bubble), but in the real world. Canada’s oil used to go the USA. Now it’s going to go to China. Canada is signing a crazy amount of free trade deals with Europe and the rest of the world these past few weeks. Canada currently trades over two thirds of its exports with the USA, but that might change.
You know, the old lady who used to live here:
Christmas beads and Valentine's beads really stand out when you use Sangre with Valentine - they work very well together. Below, you can see them in one of my latest sets. The stringer is particularly pretty - Valentine encased with Sangre.
Dexter Gordon (Round Midnight)
A chainsaw should idle sometimes too. Like when you let off the throttle, the chainsaw should stop rotating the chain. You see, when the chain is turning you stand a higher chance of cutting something. You don't want it to be a part of your body.
“No one’s Gonna Need You More” is the third song on the record and is remarkably different from the rest of the record. Although the lyrical content doesn’t blaze any new paths, the instrumentation is on another level. The song is uniquely uptempo and plays a nice foil for the much more somber tracks on the record and in their discography.
I also keep all of my race numbers and put them in magnetic photo albums.
Am still gathering information on the ex-pat populaton………….there might be a novel in it yet!!
A long time ago, I listened to Episode #100 of the Diet Soap podcast and it sparked a lot of thoughts and conversations, mostly with myself, about the nature of charity and justice and how to get from one to the other. More recently at Hope Fellowship we’ve been reaffirming our membership and commitment to the values of our little ekklesia . The last couple weeks has been teaching and discussing the value of tithing and sharing. While we can always do better, I really appreciate that we attempt to tackle one of the most touchy subjects with a little more depth, transparency and thought…how we deal with our finances. So, I thought I’d tackle some thoughts from the podcast and current conversation on the difference between charity and justice and why we should all be Mother Theresa.
4) Add glass noodles,long beans, red and green chillies and onions.Stir well for few minutes until dry.
-low to no dust
I think I might take photography classes AND grad school in 2012. Yes, I really am that dumb.
It's a series of rooms and who we get stuck in those rooms with
The idea is this: Ruth will choose ten or so entrants from her 'slush pile'. The awesome agents will then read through the material and choose a winner, who will be the lucky recipient of a partial critique (And more if they love what they read!)
"That's nice, for YOU. We are happy how things are" Insert very big, cheesy smile.
In a way, this is all incredibly ironic. I got this laptop two years ago, when the configuration of the universe was completely different and before things went to shit, because I thought that it would put me in an amazing situation: it’d take me away from windows and at the same time ease me into the transition to more customizable linux distros. It’d be an epic win on all counts, see?
But would she still be the Babe? My Babe. Our Babe.
Taketsuru was every inch the dapper young gentleman. He came from a well established sake making family, had an excellent education (one of his schoolmates became the Japanese prime minister) and seems to have had some presence about him, but going to a profoundly foreign culture to discover and record a secretive industry's technical knowhow would be daunting for anyone. Britain in 1919 was not always friendly to non-white people: the day after his visit to Nettleton, Taketsuru visited three hotels in Rothes to try to find some cheaper accommodation than the grand Station Hotel, but was turned away at each. "Some people were afraid of foreigners," he explained.
and Husband of His True Church which rose again “Reformed” out of the
I made a cake for a visiting friend a week or so ago. It's Dorie Greenspan's Perfect Party Cake. It didn't turn out quite like I'd hoped, but I was able to improvise.
Dear thesaurus,
The first sound of thunder came during that phase of slumber when we tend to think the rumble might have come from the power of imagination, some disturbing aspect in the crumbling edges of a dream. I had no such doubts about the second; it rattled the windows and shook the walls. The even rhythm of the rain was syncopated by harder beats as bits of hail fell against the flat roof right outside the west window of the bedroom.
Dan was ready for a little fun and grabbed his bass player and drummer as he headed for the small stage. The lounge band ended their set and McCafferty told them the drinks were on him if they could borrow their instruments for awhile. Manny strapped on a Fender Strat with a scowl on his face, he was a Les Paul man all the way, but it would have to do. Dan said – “this is Vigilante Man by Woody Guthrie”, Manny played a long slide intro building up the intensity before McCafferty and his band mates cut loose with a roar. Ronnie Isley came up to Ernie and asked what’s up. Ernie didn’t say anything, too surprised at Charlton’s axe playing. A friend of Ronnie’s leaned over and told him – “I think that’s Deep Purple. Heard some of them was in town, those rock bands all sound the same, don’t they.” Ronnie didn’t say anything and took another sip from his Courvoisier. McCafferty announced Joni Mitchell’s This Flight Tonight and then the small room really started to cook. What was originally a soft, acoustic tune had been turned into something sharp and electric. Marvin Isley came over to Ronnie and said –“these are some scraggly lookin’ dudes – but they mean it.” Ernie piped in with – “I don’t dig no Joni Mitchell, she’s too wordy.” When the song was over Manny yelled over to the Isleys table – “that’s how you play fooking covers, make them yer own mate.” Ronnie unbuttoned his shirt and looked at Marvin, nothing needed to be said. You don’t make it in the music business for thirty years like the Isleys on talent alone; they learned the hard way you can’t back down from anything.
On Ash Wednesday the San Fernando Magistrate Court heard two matters brought by Mr Roopnarine and his daughter Sharda Roopnarine Ramsajan, after allegations were made by Mr. Roopnarine’s former son-in-law Damian Ramsajan.
The second single (Dixie 45-1043) is a classic. The flip side, Here I Am Drunk Again is a well known cover of the Autry Inman country bopper. The a-side is a monster instrumental. The intro is all Duane Eddy before moving into Link Wray and Sandy Nelson mode. Does anyone know who the guitarist is? I know a lot of the Starday stuff is Hal Harris but it doesn't sound like him to me. It packs more punch than a jackhammer and if savage rock 'n' roll is your bag, you'll love it.
Here some of my favourite options, going from meeting at the office to walking in the park!
51) I used to have the hots for Ben Stein and Dave Navarro. I know, there's no accounting for taste. The Spouse Sparrow bugged me so much about Ben Stein that I went off him. I went off Dave Navarro when he hooked up with Carmen Electra.
No, you went to visit your GRANDMOTHER. Use ‘Big People’ words!’She then asked Mitchell what he had done
Anyway, in one of the visits to Meera’s maternal grand-uncle’s house in Hyderabad I was introduced to a gentleman who was due to release a book on Indian food and its history over the past 1000 years. That’s no mean feat!
The independent review of stadium costs by PricewaterhouseCoopers is of necessity limited by its price tag of $55,000 and the instructions of the commissioning client, Dunedin City Council. Meanwhile, the ‘independent’ Otago Daily Times is prepared to sit back as a moderate, to cover tail.
The gnostic or arcane/occult view might hold that everything we know and can know is a co-creation of the mind of the universe and our individual minds – that the universe needs us for its knowing as we need the universe for ours, and that that is a continual and continuing process of co-evolution.
At the entrance I was told by a flustered organizer that I had won a ticket (sadly, not a VIP one) and apologies for not telling me – and no, I couldn’t have a refund on the ticket I had paid for. A small price to pay to avoid a PR triumph turning to a fail, I’d have thought – I’d have given out a VIP ticket in their shoes but I only work in PR, so what do I know?
“Cardigan heads east through the night-bleak cities of America. His destination? Zimms County Home for Orphaned Children, the palace of dementia where Dr. Archer, ‘Lord of Chaos’, evilly presides – a trap baited with memories. Fires blaze in the rear-view mirror. On the roadside, ghosts, bounty hunters, mermen, Ghoul Hotels. Will D’if, the talking rat, help Cardigan escape this maze, or do all roads lead to madness?”
My feet are soft like a child’s;
The first cause of most people’s confusion is seeing the “CCP” and the “Chinese government” as being interchangeable, or even mixing up the head of the CCP with China the country or the Chinese government as an entity. The second cause is that the CCP intentionally uses this term in its propaganda to confuse public opinion. A third cause is a lack of understanding of what it means to ban something in a legal sense.
In a statistical analysis written up a few years ago in the journal Democratization, I found that countries belonging to the World Trade Organization (WTO) or its predecessor, the GATT, were more likely to attempt and sustain democratic government than ones that did not. By contrast, I found no such “boost” from participation in global or regional human-rights treaty regimes. This WTO effect showed up in models that also included a measure of trade openness, suggesting that the increased trade flows that membership is supposed to produce were not the source of the association. The statistical analysis wasn’t properly designed to identify a causal relationship, but I speculated that the WTO effect had to do with institutional and organizational changes it spurred within countries seeking to join:
The thing is, he was right. There is something about taking a shower that revives you — getting clean, washing away the dirt (both real and metaphorical), starting fresh.
Petit Bateau is a classic French label, known for making amazing cottons. They cover women well and children/babies. I did see the odd man in a petit bateau shirt but there isn’t a designated men’s line or section. The aesthetic of this brand is extremely preppy, lots of nautical themed stripes, cable knit sweaters, navy and white polos. There was a bit of floral print as well, although this is reserved mostly for intimates. I came away with an amazing cotton navy and electric blue stripped dress that’s reversible. Always worth a visit, and fairly reasonable in terms of pricing (20-150€).
Why why why why, why?
Sonic RushSonic Rush
Main meals run from $10 (toad in the hole) to $19 (bbq pork ribs) but a limited selection are available for only $10 at lunchtime on weekdays. One of the healthiest options is probably the bag of fish, an all-in-one meal of fish, greens, fennel, new potatoes, garlic, lemon and cherry tomatoes steamed in a paper parcel. Unfortunately we find the fish to be a little on the bland side when we tried it.
Bugsy (Ennio Morricone)
He paused momentarily reflecting on the positive experience. "It brought back good memories," he smiled. "I'm happy we gave it a try."
But, yes, there are a few other considerations. Maybe you care. Maybe you don't. Rice spent his entire career in Boston, where he played half his games in that hitter's haven that is Fenway Park. If anything Fenway was a better hitter's park in Rice's day than it is now. Take a look at these two sets of numbers:
You knew your own visions, your aims and your dreams,
“Well,” said Lewis Schaffer, “I don’t want to misquote him. I don’t want to put words into Reg’s mouth which he didn’t say because I want to use it in my show.”
For me, this was a great way to begin. I was able to write without the fear of rejection or wondering if I would get an agent or if it would sell, or wondering if it was any good. I wrote for the sheer joy of telling myself (and my niece) a story.
“Police had confiscated the firearm, which was used in an armed robbery in Bushbuckridge last year.”
You might have to go to the high court to get an injunction ! Just to protect your good name.
I’d have given permission
My dreams at this juncture are pretty simple. I want to create worlds. At one point it was going to be through writing, then I started working on coding to try to create a digital world. Then I got sidetracked by a mud and got sucked into that world instead. Now I’m ready to go back to the start of the circle and see if I can’t make it a spiral instead of a loop. Move forward with the urge instead of simply treading over the same ground.
Speaking of things moving, the Mulligan Stew giveaway is still in full swing, but it is almost over! There are only a few days left to donate and enter. Every prize is valuable, but there are some truly excellent prizes that warrant serious consideration!! If I didn't already own an Ipad, I'd be first in line! I also own a Nook Color (won in an adoption giveaway last year!) so I don't need a Kindle, but you might! Now the giftcards...I am totally into those because you can choose whatever you want. And there are some excellent gift cards in the mix. You can enter the Mulligan Stew Giveaway by clicking on the button on our blog (on the left), choosing a family to donate to, and then notifying the giveaway owner that you entered. It's that easy. We're almost done, and SO many people have been blessed. Have you entered? Are you feeling lucky? Want to enter again?
“During the first two or three years in __________, your skills seem to improve almost daily. It is not about __________, you have that down halfway through ___________. As one of my professors once explained, doing _________ is no more physically difficult than writing in cursive. _________mastery is about familiarity and judgement. You learn the problems that can occur during _________ or with a particular __________, and you learn how to either prevent or respond to those problems.”
ancient breath of incense
1) Sony Creative Software Inc
And lastly, besides the traditional ugly race tee (not too ugly this year) it's got the best swag bag. See exhibit A above. That's a real fabric tote in hunter green. It included: a recycle-this-not-that decal, a Road Id leaflet with a discount coupon, a miniature pen, a travel sized toothpaste & toothbrush kit, and a "Need a lawyer?" magnet. Who doesn't want one of those for their fridge?
To keep on topic, I ask. Does Ephesians 5 instruct husbands to act as prophet, priest or king for their families? Not directly. It uses a metaphor that describes the priestly and prophetic role of Christ. Metaphors are tricky because they are so successful… the purpose of a metaphor is transfer the meaning of one phrase to another. But metaphors are not meant to be literal. To understand what it means, we start by asking what it doesn’t mean. I think we all agree that husbands do not literally become Christ. Husbands do not literally atone for their wives’ sin. Husbands are not the voice of God to their wives. Husbands do not have absolute authority over their wives’ lives. How do we know this? Because of clear passages elsewhere. So, attributing the roles of prophet, priest and king to husband is not accurate.
I guess what’s so disturbing about the situation is that you get a house in a remote location so that you can escape the noise and people of the city, only to have some person show up and you can’t escape them. I’m tempted to never come up here again.
"Patent trolls" are more accurately described as patent dealers because they act as market intermediaries in the patent market. Once the activities of patent dealers are isolated from other distinct problems that have been identified with the patent system, specifically the issuance of poor quality patents and the problem of the patent thickets, it becomes clear that the emergence of patent dealers marks a stage in the natural evolution of the patent market. Patent dealers make the patent market more efficient by realigning market participant incentives, making patents more liquid, and clearing the
Back to people - this week I took photos downtown, walked along the beach, got back into the gym, and generally recovered from "the road". It's good to be back. So now that I'm officially 53 years and a few days old - no break in pace. Life goes on. Fully lived. Much appreciated. And I like to think that there are still lots of interesting pages yet to be written.
“Well,” Mom said, crooking her head, “they’re cubs. Baby cats are called kittens and baby leopards are called cubs.”
Price: $7.99 six-pack
If you've been reading for a while, you know that I've been in love with this picture of India Hicks's dining room forever. We didn't have a place to put a wall of picture ledges in our last house, but here, there are two short walls on either side of the back window in the dining room.
I have another writer in my family, my daughter, Rhiannon Lassiter We are both as parasitical and predatory for stories as any professional novelist but we have a gentlepersons' agreement to check with one another about who uses what.
Its truly unbelievable what humans do to animals to make them perform for us.
At night’s end, as Genevieve recalled that first encounter when I spoke with her decades later, they exchanged phone numbers on scraps of paper. “I’m pretty sure we had dinner maybe the Wednesday after. I think maybe he cooked me dinner. Then we went and talked in his bedroom. And then I spent the night. It all felt very inevitable.”
Some bar I haven't seen before awaits me on the other side - old looking and nothing fancy. In fact it completely flies in convention with the new themed sports bars that are popping up all over London right now. This pub has cosy corners and it’s all wood interior carries a musty theme. No chrome and no neon to distract from some serious drinking and proper conversation. Some people are at the bar.
When my eldest son was little, I’d pick him up from play-group and we’d walked happily home discussing what had happened that day, what we were going to do or where we were going to go or the many adventures of Superman.
It’s the stuff of police states, of Kafka and the Communist revolution and the Stasi-dominated dystopia of the DDR. It is also, experts warn, a damning snapshot of Britain today.
She had called earlier in the week and wanted to do a make-up trial since she wouldn't be in our hometown until Wednesday night. She did a fantastic job and we were done in a lot less time then we figured...which always helps! We tried to go to bed early 10:30 CST which was 8:30 for us. We tossed and turned a lot, but eventually made it to sleep!
Below is my email to Bonnie Plants. I urge everyone to contact them as well. They will not see the need to consider change if they don’t get a lot of communication from customers about it.
LIKE my facebook page. The click is on the right hand sidebar. It's the smaller box under the facebook badge, with the thumbs up.
N: As always this will probably depend on the turnout of the small mammals; they are the classic swing voters and tend to vote for the candidate they think is going to win. Which is confusing as we never know who that is going to be. Nonetheless, we both know that Chuwi offended the antelopes with his ‘all look the same to me’ comments so I think we should be ok.
“Have you set a date yet?” Jim asked. “Letisha will feed me leftovers for a month if I can’t give her all the details. It’s only fair to warn you, she’ll want at least one of out kids in your wedding party.” He stopped and peered at Greg. “Hey, you okay? You don’t look too happy.”
Halye said... I would use this to print pictures, wirelessly,of course!!
A few weeks ago I applied for a scholarship and place at a university in Sweden for my PhD on Plastic Pollution in the ocean. They really pulled out all the stops for me and helped me a lot with my questions and thoughts for a thesis and with OPG and the ocean row, and I’d love to do the MSc and PhD with them. It would also mean that everything fell into place with everything else, and if I get it then I will begin in August, which will mean travelling to Sweden from Georgia. Now on tenterhooks waiting to hear the outcome, and trying not to think about it. I’m never good at being patient!!!
Caroline also expressed her shock at the fact that Moat Housing Association and Brighton and Hove City Council's Social Services Team had reassured George and Diane that they would put their belongings from their old property into storage for them, only for the removal company to destroy all of their possessions, even personal belongings of emotional value, such as pictures of Diane's daughter and letters.
I just HAD to stop at the Graphic 45 booth, now did? Ok, here's a story for ya'. I've been on a decorating spree lately for my house. So off I went to my local HL store to see what they had. One thing I really appreciate about HL is the wide variety of home decor.
Following Nicki and Mary? What did you think of Super 8? Downloaded any books lately? Seen Pirates yet? Only one more day of the Challenge – are you ready? And who do you know is youthful? (Not me – I am really starting to feel my age…)
Next came The Delta Sweete. This took the Ode album on a step - it was a segued, multi-textural album about the south, and maybe her best record. Standouts were Courtyard, a delicately terrifying morality tale of wish fulfillment, and Morning Glory, cheeky and playful, with Bobbie's voice at its breathiest and most sensuous. Dotted around the album were choice covers - quite obvious, but still flavoursome - of Tobacco Road, Parchman Farm, and Louisiana Man. The oak-aged Okolona River Bottom Band had presaged the album as a November '67 single, but only reached 54; Louisiana Man, backed by Courtyard, fared even worse and spent a solitary week at number 100.
In a medium pot, add lentils and cover with water. Stir in tomatoes and tumeric. Bring to a rolling boil and simmer until the lentils are soft and cooked, about 30 minutes.
The shelves, also installed by Dad, hold lots of basket for storage.
Of course, more can always be done to promote Australian authors. Internationally, for example, we should be including writers in events such as the ‘G’DAY LA Australia Week and ‘G’DAY NY Australia Week promotions in America. Authors could also be sponsored to attend literary festivals to promote Australia and their works.
Photo Credit: ART2 CC=nc-nd-flickr.
The Salvation Army Central Oklahoma Boys & Girls Club will host the event to help raise funds for the education, sports, recreation, character development and arts programs at the club.
If only she would comprehend how important it is to value the people who surround her.
Hurry up, you have until June 13th to enter!
He added that during his days as a diplomat, it was one of the principal roles of Malaysian diplomats to project the good image of the country.
By now, we all know the story. He woke up Monday morning and just knew in his gut Denver was it. He called the Titans and 49ers first to tell them he wasn’t coming and then he called the Broncos to say he’d like to join their team. We’ve seen the breakdown of the very generous (to both sides) and practical (with respect to the injuries) contract. We’ve seen him stand before the Denver media and explain himself in Peyton Speak no less (if you need anything translated, let me know). But there was one thing that struck me and told me that this was the right decision. He mentioned that he knew there would be a lot of analysis about whether he’d chosen the right team, and his response wasn’t that people should trust him or that this that or the other was the reason why it was the right choice. He simply said that it was now his job to go out and work as hard as he could to MAKE this the right decision. Making that phone call to say he wanted to join the Broncos isn’t the end of the story. It’s just the beginning. He won’t be outworked. He won’t be out prepared. Because remember no one loves his job more than Peyton does. Peyton even got me to like John Elway who, interestingly enough, is funnier than I ever imagined he was. John said at the introductory press conference that his goal was to take what Peyton had already given the NFL and add to it and to make sure Peyton retired as the best QB to ever play the game. Now how on earth could I possibly hate a guy who makes THAT his goal. Denver is excited to have Peyton, and when this whole process started, all I really wanted was for him to go somewhere that appreciated him the way he deserved to be appreciated.
She knows more than you will admit.
Terrible picture, but this is how Hannah insisted on going to Dance Tuesday...all decked out with 3 necklaces, a bracelet, a ring and dangle earrings!! She was so proud as she walked into her class, like she was a beauty queen or something ;)
We are dealing with authorization from the source. And no other band has continued a lucrative career in the extreme music world and made it's stance known to it's own fan base as ACHERON has, before or since Crowley's sociopolitical involvement. If some poprock star is a member of the same church, in general their involvement is kept fairly silent - as not to scare away the fan base. It is not part of the package.
(Mother looks back at the mirror and makes a gesture to Anwaar and Fareda to go away. Anwaar and Fareda exit. Then the lights go out and mother exits.)
A job that actually praises you for having a balanced work/home life.
So let's see....you guys have seen the apple ones, right? So I won't post those again. I did a couple yesterday that I can show you. This one is a "Witches Brew" blend that I goosed with some fresh squeezed oranges, ripened peaches and spiced cranberries. The Witches Brew notes are cinnamon, cedarwood and patchouli. Overall, I'd say it's a little like woods and berries:
somewhat disturbing.
Paradise Cove is possibly one of the best kept secrets in L.A. Hidden away off the PCH (Pacific Coast Highway, for non-locals :)) in Malibu, less than 20 miles west of downtown Santa Monica - Paradise Cove offers a family-owned restaurant and bar ON THE SAND, on their own private beach far away from the unwashed masses and wide-eyed, slow-paced tourists that clog up its more famous neighbors down the coast.
We left on Saturday February 18 for a little pre-birthday adventure into the wildness that is New York. First, we stopped by the very secure, highly private offices of Boingo Wireless (AKA my husbands office) to waste some time before our flight. I got bored quickly and wanted to people watch, so we made that stop a quickie.
I learned to set phone boundaries from being a music teacher in my home. If the phone rings during a music lesson, I don't take the call. Although I am at home, I am working. The student has paid for 30 minutes, and it is my job to be honest and give them that time. I show myself the same respect when I am writing.
And I have my own definition of “befriend” but this isn’t about that. This is about poor confused positive people. They work on something clearly impossible with strong determination, encouraged by irresponsible friends and family members, possibly intoxicated by Glee. If staying positive can make our dreams come true by staying positive, it can be considered a source of energy, and energy converts to another form of energy, and my instant noodles should be cooked by my positivity in just about 3 minutes from now.
Week 2 Sleep: 24 hours (A slight improvement over Week 1, but setting a bad precedent for on/off sleep)
4:00 PM ‘Business Banking Relationship & Services for our Clients’
His father: "Who's there?"
"The functionality of a computer program and the programming language cannot be protected by copyright
Martha & The Muffins Echo Beach CAN
III. II Corinthians 5:14-17 A New Creation
Unless anything changes, this story will swiftly follow the aftermath of the ludicrously named "Arab spring" and the invasion of Libya in the black hole where news stories which didn’t have the politically correct ending the press had hoped for go, and will soon become another of the inconvenient events which the controlled media chooses to forget.
At that point it was the dirty trick to get a fix that annoyed me. I wasn't aware then that Marge was HIV+. He had previously spoken freely of the disease and while admitting his lover had died from AIDS he was always adamant that he hadn't contracted the virus. He didn't seem to care about the stigma of the disease and so I reckoned: Why would he lie? I told myself that that concern was fine, that his crime was being afraid to lose his get-well fix and nothing more.
It is no secret that I enjoy gardening. Getting my hands dirty and watching the seeds turn into seedlings, and then grow into full plants that produce fruits and vegetables, is a very rewarding process.
It’s the year of the Dragon, oh Universe. It’s supposed to be my year. For everything. I’m supposed to be on top of my game, and I was for a while. I professionally choreographed a dance, my idea for my screenplay is a hit, my column is receiving great feedback, I’m in a great favor with my on-campus job, I’m losing weight, I’m cancer-free, I’ve made great new girlfriends, and I’ve had my luck with the guys.
This area would appear to be the one with most risk for Mr Bird. By the end of January 2011 it was revealed that, in fact, the emails had not been lost. The Independent reported http://ind.pn/hSRgAm that the emails were in fact available, and stated that “News International now says Mr Bird unintentionally misled the court, but insists that all the emails sought by the defence were disclosed to it either by the newspaper or the police.”
Rating 63
Sometimes you just never know what is going on, even next door. I guess that is the reasoning behind treating everyone a little kinder than you think they should be treated. You just never know what battle they are fighting.
By my calculations that same woman now hasa full time job (that takes WAY more than the 9-5 a regular old job would have) by taking care of the baby and now does all the laundry, folding and putting away, cooks all the food (he may/may not cleans the dishes), cleans the entire house and bathroom on her own now.
It's a white gel/creme and it dries clear once you rub it in. A tiny amount goes a long way, I barely used any under both eyes.
Of course, another reason for international discrimination against the Falun Gong is that some fear that if they are seen as associating with Falun Gong they might lose business opportunities in China or collaborative programs with the Chinese regime.
Then spring is here."
Prosecutors are stressing their desire to continue investigating the allegations. They say a special deal for the King’s son-in-law is not in the works.
This is all coming together so well that I think--nay--I feel that I must get this shirt for my birthday:
6. Take control of basic parenting situations – it gives children a sense of security. Don’t buy rubbish food, remove all fizzy from the house. Children will eat well if they only have healthy food available – and no alternatives. Be wary of making Owls eat wheat, eggs, dairy fish, etc if they have a natural aversion to them – broccoli, sprouts and zucchini are still fair game – at least have these on the plate and get them to lick the food (it can take 50 or more tastes to add a new food to their repitoire). Have early bedtimes, about 40 minutes before you think they should be asleep. 20 mintues for general mucking around, 10 minutes for story and cuddles, 3 minutes for them to tell you anything they need to tell you and 7 minutes to get to sleep. Our five year old has a 6.30pm bedtime, our nine year old a 7.15pm bedtime. (Three year olds dropping their last sleep are another matter for another blog.) Say No rarely, but mean it. Use “I’ll think about it” if you would usually say no and back-down. Demand the use of manners, and don’t do anything for a child who is rude.
"Ya, because writers get to do that."
I of course knew about Anthony Weiner tweeting about his weiner but I think I just thought 'what a weiner' to put your weiner out there like that.
4 pkg. Knox unflavored gelatin
World Card Making Day was this past Saturday, did you join in? I didn't, I was at my local scrapbooking shop at their 5th anniversary sale. I picked up some Copic markers for $4 a piece about $3 less then retail! That is a pretty good deal, I am told. Because I'm still so new at this, it still seems hard to believe these things are cheap - LOL :)
Councillor Samson reported that there are three things he has been working on: movement of the traffic guard from Creighton and Kemp to the stoplight at Bridlewood; the erection of two flashing signs to indicate the school area and reduced speed (One at Huntingwood and the other at Moss Blvd.); and a traffic round-a-bout at Davidson Blvd or Pirie. The most recent information received with regard to the round-a-bout was that it is going into the 2007 budget, however they must do an Environmental Assessment before they can finalize it. The purpose of constructing a round-about will be to slow traffic flows while maintaining movement on Governor’s Road.
1-7 pm “Americanarama” @ The Basement – it’s always one of our favorite parties of the conference ** Great Bands + Free Beer and hot dogs to the first 100 people **
Eggplant really soaks up oil so I try to use as little as necessary. You could deep-fry these but on the other extreme, you could also bake them. I like the middle road of pan-frying. I make a very fast marinara sauce by cooking up some crushed tomatoes with garlic powder, salt, dried basil, dried oregano, black pepper and a pinch of red chile flakes. It's done in 15 minutes!
Recently my dear hairdresser was burdened with her mothers medical crisis. We picked up a coffee and flowers on route to our appointment. I was really shocked at how down trodden this young woman was. Her beautiful thirty eight year old face was aged, worn and sad. Our appointment was interrupted by many calls pertaining to her moms care. We were only happy to accommodate the pauses considering we could have been cancelled completely.
Whether you're traveling with an infant, carry a large number of passengers seems set to remain as strong as ever, so long as we, as travellers, keep our hunger for travelling as far as possible, for as little as possible. This rise of these budget airlines are not required to use Taxis for local transportation.
So here are the answers from yesterday's..
Legwarmers: Payhalf.
Get down!
from the Latin word "rejoice". Gaudete Sunday anticipates the joy of the Christmas celebration, so its color is a mixture of Advent purple and Christmas white. It may also symbolize the color of early dawn.
I subscribe to receive emails from the universe through www.tut.com. This was my email for today:
The courts make it clear to witnesses that a wilful failure to answer properly will be met with a couple of hours in the cells “to consider one’s position” and if the witness fails to “purge their contempt” then an appearance before the judge at the case’s conclusion for punishment awaits.
1/2 tsp. cayenne pepper
Come take me home again
This week, please welcome Christine Fonseca to the blog. She is the queen of conveying emotion. Her novella, Dies Irae, is both powerful and dynamic. I won't say anymore and just let the week-long interview with Christine speak for her and her works. Since no party is complete without a giveaway, make sure to come back on Friday.
Step 2: Open the tubes of crescent rolls. Wrap each apple slice in one crescent roll. try to pinch the dough together around the apple slice. Place them into a baking dish.
The gulf coast after the oil spill.
Today’s Ladurée—with three proper salons de thé in Paris as well as other locations in posh cities such as London, Tokyo and Monaco—is best known for these sweet and sublime treats. Indeed, walking around the Paris, you’ll notice locals and tourists alike toting the pastel green shopping bags with pride and anticipation. If you’ve never sampled one, book your ticket to Paris tout de suite.
Of course, no one objects to this kind of objectification.
“The thyroid gland will have to be removed,” said Buenos Aires-based cancer specialist Julio Moreno. “The prognosis is very good. The chances of being cured are 90 to 98 percent.”
Grudgingly, one has to acknowledge that there is a small residue of adult behaviour left in The Sunday Telegraph, it having devoted a tiny part of its output today to a subject far more important than the media "self" obsession. And it has the grace to admit that it is far more important.
a beautiful, literary book about writing haiku in the spirit of haiku
"We should've let him go," I might add. "Alpine Rescue could've used his bones as a cautionary tale."
Zymarika Tylihta
How To Create A Great Outdoor Environment
The characters in this novel are complex. While a few of the side characters lack development, the majority of the characters are well developed and believable. You can see the motivations behind the character’s actions, and you can feel the real tragedy of their circumstances.
What types of stories strike your fancy?
I have noticed a bit of a flaw with the Kanban set, the birds don't fit in the cage - you'd have the RSPB onto you if you had two birds in a cage that size! - never mind, it's artistic!
Yeah, not even your mom. You don't 'owe' your parents anything when it comes to having sex, even if they think you do. They may have created that body, but they aren't the ones who are inhabiting it, and they aren't the ones who are going to have to live with whatever choice you make for the rest of their lives. However well they know you, they don't know you any better than yourself. That means they can't make that decision for you. Sure, take into account what they think you should do. Have some respect if they say 'we don't mind you having sex, but please don't do it under our roof'. But they don't have the ability to decide when you're ready or not. Even if they think they do.
year
The interest of passing bees
to other moments and scenes
It's been a while since I let myself get to that raw place and this morning I'm climbing out of it again.
The Environment Assessment prepared for PWCS is an impressive document, but unfortunately we have little faith in it. We have too often seen these types of large projects under-estimating their social and environmental impact and justifying their approval by focusing on the economic benefits of their development.
so, anyone going to play today?
By life rhythm, I'm talking about all the stuff that gives us our spiritual, emotional, and physical balance. All of our lives are either in rhythm OR they are out of rhythm. There are six parts of this rhythm that need to flow together: 1. family/relationships 2. prayer/meditation/time with God 3. work/calling 4. Play/exercise/nutrition (physical). 5. Rest/sleep 6. Free time/margin. God intends for all of these to be blessings but if they are out of sync or rhythm, the results are disastrous. So we all must find that rhythm...which of these is lacking and how can you balance it with the others to find rhythm in your life? I'm working on a new rhythm...hope you're working on yours.
Here is my summary of bests and favorites of the schools we have seen to date:
Even something as simple as an alien invasion of Earth took on an almost "art house" shine when helmed by this man.
My mother is almost 90 now. Frail. Delicate. A tiny sparrow of a woman, my mother still hears larks singing. She still sees the beauty of a red sunset and she still knows the gifts of love. Her life has not been easy. She has lost her husband and her only son, been distanced from two of her granddaughters through the grief that followed. My mother sits quietly now. She no longer fights back. She no longer cries out for me to 'be careful', 'slow down'. She no longer cautions me to be like the others, to stop doing it my way, to quit making waves.
1. I am a new fan of elite level women’s hockey and
And the Lord God said, “The man has now become like one of us, knowing good and evil. He must not be allowed to reach out his hand and take also from the tree of life and eat, and live forever.” So the Lord God banished him from the Garden of Eden to work the ground from which he had been taken. After he drove the man out, he placed on the east side of the Garden of Eden cherubim and a flaming sword flashing back and forth to guard
British politics has got a bit strange. First of all, who on earth is Nick Clegg? Here's who:
Society is afraid of alonedom, like lonely hearts are wasting away in basements, like people must have problems if, after a while, nobody is dating them. but lonely is a freedom that breaths easy and weightless and lonely is healing if you make it.
Money shouldn't always have to dictate form. One can use the same amount of money that as built modern 19c/20c uniformity be it back to backs or new towers , create with a little thoughtfulness and a bit of originality, one can make something culturally meaningful and beautiful
Eyeliner: Dutch Touch – Eyeliner – Nr. 1
Well, it can’t hurt right? Write.
P: Pushy-Yes I can admit that I’m pushy when I really want something!
“Of course,” I replied impatiently, “I’ve been in isolation cells all over the world.” Slowly he swung open the massive door, and I saw the prisoner in that punishment cell: a crucifix, beautifully carved by the inmates – the prisoner Jesus hanging on the cross.
The Ottoman style houses have been preserved and restored. The neighborhood has turned into a tourist area with cafes and chai houses, though many locals still live in the houses, above the businesses.
I want you to always be here
Literature festivals can be enticing smorgasbords. You wander around tasting bits of ideas here, slices of art there. But it is especially interesting when you can sit down to a 3-course, theme-based meal. Sunday's events on offer at the Jewish Book Week literary festival included just that - a 3 session overview of Polish cultural life, as it was, as it is now, and where it might be heading.
Write about your astrological sign.
Advance monies depend on a lot of factors.
NWTC officials plan to expand the program the following school year.
Nov 20 Nottingham Rock City Nottingham, UK
More importantly, the ways we process larger-scale musical events - such as phrase repetition and developments, modulations and unexpected turns - all rely on activity in the same part of the brain we use for decoding syntax in ordinary language. It remains unclear what, if anything, is being communicated, but the old adage that music is a universal language is nonetheless shown to have some grounding in scientific fact.
Crowds of tailors based on Savile Row, protested in front of Westminster City Council, chanting statements like ‘Give three-piece a chance’. The Council who will make the decision on whether or not to allow the retailer to open on the street, stated that the demonstrations would not influence any official decisions made by them.
What's next? Well, I'm officially 100% debt-free, which is, of course, a great feeling. I still have my basic bills like rent, car insurance, etc. but I live very cheaply and well below my means. So now, with no debt to pay off, I have my sights set on maxing out my savings accounts. I have a lot of little savings accounts with very small balances in which I put aside maybe $10 or $20 a month. Now I have to figure out which ones take precedence and I'll try to snowball all of what I was paying for school loans into those accounts, until each one is at a level where I feel comfortable. And then I can go back to the $10-a-month payment.
By the early 90’s, I was married and had a young child. My husband, Gary Golio, and I were reading a lot of picture books. We were also studying T’ai Chi with the children’s book illustrator Ed Young, who often talked about his work and about the world of children’s books. I became more and more intrigued and began to experiment with picture book texts. I joined SCBWI , went to conferences, submitted manuscripts – and got lots of rejections.
I like that they are risky and take chances. This year they did Bach sonatas and a Brandenburg concerto using a piano. Try finding recordings of those. But they sounded great – even if the piano lid stick should have been lower to damper the piano sound which occasionally overwhelmed the others.
then offers it back to fate
door gift - still surfing
Supply requisition records for Company K show that William Washington Knight was was in service in Dalton, Georgia on December 6, 1863. Shortly after that, Knight was furloughed home because of illness. He died of chronic diarrhea at Milltown, GA December 27, 1863.1
Water is one of the best sources of sustaining life. Without enough intake of water in the body, the body will become dehydrated and sickly. People trying to lose fat and drink plenty of water will help the fat to burn quickly. Therefore, it is important that one travel with a bottle of water when away from home. Taking a sip of water every occasionally will definitely help to keep dehydration away.
Hi everyone, just a quick hello and reminder that the Peculiar Playmates Show begins next Saturday, August 7, 2010 at 7 P.M.. I had such an awesome time making these pieces. I hope you all get a chance to view the works if not in person then online at www.bearandbird.com. Here is a tiny sneak peek at what you will see when the show opens. Have a great week!!
And thus I've decided that I myself, am ready for my very own New York City art exhibition, because I do more than just sit in a chair peeing in my dress. I sculpt every day. So do you. And my sculpture is a living one.
What with the 12 noon start and the constant wandering we were flagging by the time the doors were opened to the public at five. We thought that was a good time to call it a day. It wasn't though as were were soon suffering the stifling, crowed commuter train home. We'll just have to stay later next year.
The Diner was quite large, could seat a hundred people and as it was approaching 2pm on a Sunday, not too many people in there, surprisingly. Or not? Perhaps we had been given a bum steer or was the Dixie Diner pumped up too much? Hank and Bobbie-Joe were nervous, but tired. They were here and it was here they would be eating as there were still palpable hours ahead on the road to Dallas. Not too long after that, our food arrived.
I noticed in the Mirror and the Sun the other night (don’t look at me funny, I get paid to read the tabloids sometimes) reports about a six-year-old boy with a huge book deal. Being under deadline, I skimmed the articles and assumed that the real story behind them was something fairly prosaic: a ghostwritten book with a cute kid to front it, the idea of some canny publisher or other.
PSYC 331 - Abnormal Psychology
Charlie freaks out at the magnitude of what she's about to do and Sam has to give her a pep-talk via the head-set about how she needs to kick ass like Hermione (causing Dean to comment, "Way to go, Dumbledore.") It's adorable, but not as good as when Charlie has to flirt with a guard and blanks (due to a combo of nerves and her being a lesbian) and DEAN has to feed her lines, telling Sam, "This NEVER happened." Amid it all was a great tattoo reference--Charlie has a Slave Leia straddling a 20 sided dice that she got while drunk at Comic-Con. Charlie turns up that Dick is expecting a very important delivery (and also that is password is w1nn1ng--ha!). The boys go to the private airport to swap out his delivery, giving us Sam and Dean in goggled bright orange vest doofusness, but Charlie's trapped in the building with Dick. Busted.
Friday, we train to Edinburgh. I am looking forward to seeing that city. I am glad that I will be coming back to Oban. It is a lovely place.
However, spring break week wasn't too bad! It was a bit cold and gray where we were, but we had a good time nonetheless. When we left, there was an extra dog in our backyard. Our own dogs, Baxter and Ellie, weren't sure what to make of the little fella. We named him Carlos, from the movie "The Hangover", which my husband and I had just watched before the dog came to stay a while. My husband ended up having to work the week of spring break, so he stayed home. This turned out to be a good thing, because he was able to put out a sign for the found dog, and Carlos (a.k.a. Buddy) was able to get back to his owners!
But in completing the scheduled work, crews found debris inside one of the basins. In the process of cleaning it up, “several unfavorable conditions were uncovered,” according to a statement from the Parks Department, “including structurally unstable paths and walls that will require extensive technical revision.”
Q: Many readers might hope to get their copies of "Driving Mister Yogi" autographed by the two main characters. Any suggestions?
The purpose of this project is to SEE your loved ones (again). Kelly, like many of us, found herself getting caught up in day to day life and needing some inspiration to rekindle that love she has for her family. I have to say - I've been faced with that very same thing, especially with a new baby in the house.
shot home. But then:
Cindy
Anyway, the end of the bed is my perch when I work on fabric projects, and I like the set up this way, but who knows if it will stay.
Please go visit the new blog, where the first story is now up. Read, reflect, offer support. Share your story if you think it might help you or someone else. Details on how to do so can be found in the right sidebar on the new blog.
Stix 2 dimensional foam pads 3mm
Catalyst Game Labs has done very well with this one.
JunkScience.com recently obtained through the Freedom of Information Act the results of tests conducted on 41 people who were exposed by EPA researchers to high levels of airborne fine particulate matter – soot and dust known as PM2.5.
May 13 - Brgy. Ampayon
The contestants are told to create a well-known dish (I’ll use Prawn Cocktail as an example), it’s up to them whether they modernise it, de-construct it, recreate it in classic form, or add an “ethnic” twist.
Frederick shared with us several quotations during the workshop, including one of my favorites:
and then i will post it on my blog
There is an open house this Sunday, April 29th from 2-5 PM.
One great big shiny bright tunnel ahead. Going to feel amazing.
New bod is what I'd rather own.
Until next time happy bird sewing.
Sometimes though, I just have to buy a book in a shop. I like the excitement, the thrill, the build up of doing so. I like going out on release day and seeing it and knowing it can be MINE. Though sometimes this does backfire, like the time I pre-ordered CoFA from Waterstones, only for them not to have it, and I had to go to the other Waterstones who then had to go find their copies from the back aaand...it was all very traumatic.
But… you’re not writing home.
Given the above arguments, it seems most reasonable to conclude that while Descartes’ arguments are powerful and well reasoned, they are not powerful enough to create the desired degree of doubt.
Okay, get to work. Don't forget when you are finished to store everything in one location for future use. I have one of those large plastic tubs that holds everything. When I finish I put it all back and it goes downstairs on the shelf until I need it again. Yes, I even put a pair of scissors in there. They aren't that expensive any more and you will be glad to have them right where you need them.
The year was 1949, and 25-year-old Marlon Brando — “the brilliant brat,” as LIFE magazine called him following his astonishing work on Broadway in A Streetcar Named Desire — had finally answered the call of Hollywood. He was preparing to film his movie debut in The Men, the wrenching story of a World War II vet coping with rage and insecurity after he’s paralyzed in combat. And while it’s true that L.A. was used to next-big-thing newcomers, it was (and still is) exceedingly rare to chronicle the earliest days in the career of a movie actor of Brando’s intensity, eccentricities and electrifying talent.
02 Catch A Wave
We once had the "Great Debate" between Bahnsen and Stein, but we now have a more recent debate...
Call (512) 482-9002 for showtime
30-something: It needs to show off the good parts and hide and contain, smooth and lift the not so good parts.
And on that note, I’ll finish this ‘rant’. I felt I had to say something. Let’s attack the problem from the angle of the minority who can’t engage in a meaningful dialogue with their kids and who don’t care if they start drinking at ten years old. But leave the rest of us to live our lives productively and quietly and as a community.
“The young man who makes his first entrance into the world of society, should know how to choose his friends, and next how to conduct himself towards them.”
Hello, happy morning, and welcome to The ThINKin' Spot! Today is a very special day, indeed, because we're celebrating the birthday of the very sweet, and talented Angelica Suarez with a birthday blog hop! If you arrived here from the very creative Heather Hoffman's House Built of Cards Blog, then you are hopping along in just the right order, but if you just happened along, then head back to the beginning of this hop at Kathy's blog so that you can start from the very beginning and not miss one wonderful creation along the way! Here's the card I made to celebrate Angelica's birthday, and it will soon be on it's way to her. I know, I know... It'll be late, but better late than never. At least that seems to be the way I roll, lately.
She really put the "fear-of-God" into me by telling me that she felt within 5-6 years I would be a very sick woman if I did not make some big changes.
To date, 32 recipients of the Nobel Prize, primarily in the fields of economics and physics, have been involved or associated with RAND at some point in their career.
After having missed the August 11 Republican debate, I finally had the opportunity to check it out in full yesterday. As a liberal, watching these debates are always rather frustrating and scary, but I feel that as somewhat of a political wonk, it's important to hear and understand (if possible) the perspectives of those on the other side.
It's been a while since I posted a How to Write (Like I do) post. This is the latest chapter I've posted to my on-going tips book CRAFTING YOUR BEST STORY, posted for free at Wattpad. You can find a link to it in my writing and publishing tab.
No, that is up to the court to decide. We have taken steps to notify the court of the need to convene an inquest. So I expect the inquest to start some time within next week.
165×3
The rain drop paper is from Imaginisce with others from my scrap stash. The girl is cut from the Enjoy the Seasons cart.
At the big girls' school parties, I showed up to find Kaitlyn with a head full of bows that I thought had fallen into the abyss somewhere. She finally found them in her desk and stuck them all in her hair! Looks festive to say the least!
Yep. You read that right. I had to go pick up the vaccinations at the pharmacy, keep them in my fridge, and then go back to see her again today so she could stick said needles in me. Lovely. And I paid for two appointments for her to do that. Seriously, if the pharmacy is going to hand the drugs over to me, couldn't I just stick the needles in myself? Because, yes, the needles do come in the package that was given to me. Luckily, my fear of needles will always prevent me from sticking myself with them, but still...
Follow every rainbow,
- Harold Lloyd died 6 years ago;
So now, what are the policies and regulations for the practice of ART, registration and marketing of ART products in African countries, if any, and where can they be located?
When I was in high school, I had a couple of boyfriends. Nice boys who were afraid and confused like me. Nice boys who were able to see past my shit and try to insert themselves into my life despite the Roger Waters-esque WALL I built around myself to keep them out. They kissed me, they gave me tokens of their affection, a few brave ones even told me they loved me…Poor boys. I wanted nothing to do with that. I wanted nothing to do with “needing” and “loving” and “forever”. Oh hell no. Life was too unpredictable and scary to let someone take me from me. No flipping way would I let some boy in and let him have access to me. No way.
To that end, he said, he had instructed all pastors and youth-group leaders to no longer schedule sports games and practices on Sunday mornings, which he said were major diversions.
“What??!!!” I replied.
“No. This is serious. You assaulted a team member. I’m not about to let that slide.”
Dillinger & The Upsetters - Mid-East Rock
Desire, danger, intrigue, and steamy seduction unite a sexy spymaster and an intrepid bluestocking as Stefanie Sloane’s luscious new series continues.
Well, it's 8:30 on a Sunday... beautiful out, sunny, breezy, cold... A perfect late winter New England day.
Secretive. Unpredictable. Because this contradicts the honest/heart-on-sleeve aspect (see below) it seems bizarre that I could possibly be secretive. But I've been able to really surprise people more often than you'd think. I play my hand close to my chest, it seems, without being aware of it.
Ow, he thought. What am I doing outisde? Why am I coverd in glass?
I don’t live out what I say I believe. I fail. We hear “be the change you wish to see in the world,” and then we just go on listening to nice slogans and not changing a thing except reciting the same slogans that aren’t changing a thing.
Family Of Intelligence - Learning From My Brother (Kemet)
Jean-Louis Barrault Les Perles de la Couronne
5. Will the Sebastian Hardie reformation and recording of ‘Blueprint’ lead to further recordings and a full tour (or will we fans have to wait another 36 years?
You can win two prizes, one winner will be chosen at random from the entries and will win a $5 gift certificate to the Phindy's Place Store and one entry will win Card of the Week with the creator also receiving a $5 gift certificate. Don't forget that once a month we will choose an overall winner from the weekly winners and they will be offered a Guest position on the DT - and of course a free image from Phindy's Place to use for that week's challenge!
We must say a big thank you to Kinderland, another community organisation that shares the burden of helping marginalised Indonesian children, for working with us to help make our dream of the Smart Cart come true.
impRRoov the appeeRents uv the citay.
Mysterious keys
Well of course we shall accept that! It is without doubt true. However it does not explain anything at all. When the baby is born, this wiring is not really in place. The neurones are all there and they are getting ready to make the connections. It is quite true that in the case of children with ADHD or dyslexia the wiring is sometimes, although not always, a little different. How did this come to be? Was it a predetermined response to the genetic instructions or was it caused by the first years of life and the lifestyle of the developing infant? Or, which is far more likely, was it a subtle combination of both? Might it be that the newborn baby had a slight inclination in a certain direction, an inclination which the early environment might bring out and allow to flourish?
SLAYER will play the entire “Seasons In The Abyss” album.
I just had to share my devotion from today out of "His Princess Warrior" by Sheri Rose Shepherd
"All games I played while researching The Secret History of Kate Bush, an absurdist experiment to see how far the rock bio could be stretched without snapping. I adopted the persona of a mad professor so obsessed that he traces Kate Bush's genealogy back to the Vikings. And I also stalked the woman, as a phenomenological acting out of that uneasy and twisted boundary between fascination and obsession. Oddly (or perhaps not), the book became the bestselling bio of that singer. But what most struck me was how straight were the readings people made of this text. I still find discussions on the Internet debating whether "I" was "really" obsessed with Kate Bush, as well as allegations I not only had an affair with her, but that while researching her life I ran over her cat.
-Explore the world! Get Hillock's save spot or check out Canthus Castle with the metal slimes that spawn around it.
So before we even get to the actual film, how about the Netflix envelope? This movie is so half-assed and confusing that even the envelope it comes in from a movie rental service is apologizing for it, admitting that it is so stupid that nobody could for even one second find it credible. These are the words, printed verbatim from the outside package, that come with Highlander 2: “This sequel to the cult sci-fi action film largely discards the original’s premise of mysterious immortal swordsmen, revealing Connor McLeod and Juan Sanchez Villa-Lobos Ramirez to be long-lived aliens.”
On April 19th 2012 I attended International trade Seminar at WORLD CHAMER OF COMMERCE at 200 Peachtree. The founder of the Chamber is Solange Warner – an amazingly strong and visionary woman who cares most about standing up against human traffic.
Like so many of our neighbors and friends, Mr. Savage would have us believe that his inability to believe is based in logic. He reasons that the Bible and those who follow it (including his mother) are grossly illogical, thereby blockading the enlightened from believing. But even in his memoir he tips his hand, showing that his unwillingness to believe really lies–as it does with every human being–in self-righteousness. When Mr. Savage entered the gay lifestyle, instead of being worried about hell or concerned with the church’s teaching, he simply assumed they were wrong. The doubts trickled in and then raged from that point. A person’s unwillingness to consider that they are wrong at the deepest, most foundational levels, is what keeps them from trusting Jesus. As Jesus put it, “It’s not the healthy who need a doctor, but the sick.”
The crux of the show, however, is not the photographs. For as good as they are, we’ve seen this work before. The centerpiece instead is three mini-stadiums built out of plywood. Two have voyeur holes. One is completely closed.
Or weeding in the garden,
- I say: I’m liking Yoren and his dagger skills. Davon is pretty cool as well.
How to:
Today's card is the next in my series of 4 for the baby boutique I make cards for. This one was REALLY simple to make, but I think it has a big impact. The different patterned papers were cut to 2.5" x 1". I arranged them in a chevron pattern and added the felt letters and bling to the bottom. Way easy!
~ Let not the wind steal dignity ~
So I’ve decided that because of school and busy schedule and all I am not going to regulate when I post. I find that it often leads to more stress and I end up missing the time I said I would post. I will try to post at least once a week, though.
And to you Fathers out there, OBVIOUSLY I'm kidding. We do need Mother's Day.
STO: I saw on your myspace player that "Love Is A Dream" was a song from a demo. Why was it used on this album and not the debut? Are any older songs likely to appear on future albums?
say that they were snotty, they weren’t. Nobody had high-tech security systems; they trusted their
He moved on to saying that he was happy to see the NEA come and happy to see it go. Because Nixon, he generalized, ruined everything by tripling art funding. This was bad because it cut out the dealers and the artists and promoted the institutions. This was the advent of “non commercial art” that can only exist in a museum.
When my mom offered to babysit earlier in the week, he couldn't get onto Open Table fast enough.
I know that Omlette has a giant fear of zombies, and this would be a good exercise for him in case of a zombie apocalypse.
Every marriage relationship goes through a valley now and then. It is during those times that a husband or wife is more vulnerable to compliments or attention from someone of the opposite sex. Be careful! Realize that you’re vulnerable and flee the situation as soon as possible.
You are,
Hulk issues an “Open Fight Night” when an outside comes out to fight, if Hogan and his 3 hand-picked judges like the guy, he will get a TNA contract.
JM: Is there any lasting aesthetic influence of the Children of the Plumed Serpent?
It’s true that the month of Ramadan brings a Muslim much closer to Allah and opens a door to a much simpler and more humble way of life. Many of us enter this month with the intention of strengthening our Imaan and becoming better Muslims yet at the end of Ramadan we once again forget the suffering of our brothers and sisters around the world and indulge heavily in worldly desires.
“Come here, Max and Sparkie – come fetch your new ball! !”
Like you are stripped somewhat of your childlikeness naivete of a loving God at this moment in the gospels.
So that in all things, as is aforesaid, the Unity in Trinity and the Trinity in Unity is to be
Probiotics - I think we all know that they are good for us. Research has shown that probiotics are beneficial and even necessary for good gut health. Just google probiotics and there are tons of articles and studies out showing the importance of them.
In case you have not heard, the new Summer blockbuster will be The Dark Night Rises, Batman film premiering soon. My youngest will not be seeing it, however he still loves Batman. Every so often he looks at me very seriously and says "I'm Batman".
Meanwhile, I have been adding an applied i-cord edging to this throw. It is knitted from scraps of sock yarns from the idea on Mason-Dixon Knitting. I had never tried the i-cord edging before but it made a neat finish. One of those mindless repetitive tasks in which knitting induces a meditative trance.
But her Mum was in heaven, there was no-one to love her
On the other hand you never know when you might find a kindred spirit among a shelf of old books. I have more in common with Edward Thomas than with 90% of my contemporaries . I love his poetry but have a greater affection for some of his prose. 'In Pursuit of Spring' is a wonderful book, as is 'The South Country' - the story of the clerk who spends every summer working on the land expresses perfectly the rootlessness of modern (sub)urban life. Thomas befriended, championed and looked after the poet WH Davies, whose 'Autobiography of a Super-Tramp' I picked up the other day and read mostly in one sitting. Published in 1908 and written in simple, unsentimental prose, it is a frank account of a youth most people would consider misspent. The particular edition I found was from Jonathan Cape's Traveller's Library of the 1930s, and it looks, feels and smells as if a tramp had been carrying it around for a while.
So, because I have half an hour time left, before we eat lunch, I thought, I would like to update here a bit.
HarperTeen
He said she was demanding and rude and wasted time in the middle of a crisis.
right now I’m really excited and am trying hard to sleep so that I don’t have dark eye rings tomorrow. guess I’m getting more and more sleepy as I type this entry on my iPhone. time to rest…
Isn't that beautiful? I wish I'd thought of that. The essence of both "progressives" and the city of San Francisco encapsulated in one simple sentence.
When I were a lad, I did not start in my teens - unlike many of my contemporaries - as I did not have school dinner money to re-appropriate for the habit, as I was a picky blighter who took a packed lunch to school instead. My eating habits have improved since, and I've also smoked the odd tobacco product.
Super work again ladies - you do me proud!
The hair i am wearing is one of the latest releases from Truth. It is rigged mesh and it reminds me SO MUCH of the very first ever hair i bought from Truth 2 years ago so I had to have it! The dress it a new release from Valentina E and it is becoming one of my very fave mesh stores in world! Beautiful!
Ben-Zion Netanyahu was eulogized by many as a great scholar, intellectual and ideologue of unwavering principles. Education Minister Gideon Saar said Ben-Zion Netanyahu was a “Zionist in every fiber of his being” and a man who saw with “clear sobriety the dangers facing our people.”
What was your fourth best memory?
Eric Metaxas, who wrote Bonhoeffer: Pastor, Martyr, Prophet, Spy, gave a speech on February 2 at the National Prayer Breakfast that really points out the difference between real Christianity and go-with-the-flow Christianity:
the lion of the Punjab
Next Steps
With that demand, comes the responsibility that we tell the truth first, in ourselves. Too many of us delegate our responsibility to the media…and too many believe there is no personal responsibility at all.
For the bodice I used the e50-whites. Notice how brown they look? Much more brown than when I colored them above. Its because of the skin being more yellow-orange. It changes the way we see the white. It's the same thing with the socks--they look much more white than the skirt, even though I used the same colors. The skin tone changes how we see the white of the socks.
3. Speaking of doctors, even though I am a doctor myself, I get really nervous whenever I have to be a patient and go see a doctor myself. Like….really nervous. I have this fear that whenever I have something that is bothering me (like my continuous sinus infections), it will turn out to be nothing real and I’ll look like the biggest hypochondriac and/or wimp.
Andrew Lynch
7) ZOMBIE – The Big Guys
14kg Weyermanns Pilsener malt
I would tell Rose what I want and sit still, watching the employees take out trays of food. “Can I have a Pepsi, Rose?” I ask Rose. Rose get up and takes the liberty, herself, to get the Pepsi. I would sip happily through a straw and wait for the bread and butter. As soon as it’s set down, I’m eating a piece of it already.
I don’t have to think.
5 please
The Sword Masters are the main combat force in the list. I plan to keep these guys protected by Glittering Robes and Shield of Saphery. Banner of Eternal Flame for the pesky, regenerating things. (For anybody who saw the list pre-revision, the two units have been merged and they have the Icon to protect against war machines).
Caves. Bungalows. Light houses. Cages. All have made appearances on former episodes, and all would send me into a full-on, can’t-breathe-must-die-now panic attack.
But, the other drugs for autoimmune disorders have worse side effects, and since there isn't anything life threatening going on, my rheumatologist doesn't want to try them. She does however, want to try a drug that is sort of experimental for my condition. It's approved for other things, but not for immune disorders, which means Medi-Cal is going to fight to not pay for it...but if we can convince them that it could be useful I will be going off the prednisone and trying this new drug.
1957: Crowd gathers. Mark wins. Johnny and Mark shake hands and end up buddies.
The layout is of my nephew, Jimmy, on his birthday this past year. I don't get to see them because they are in Florida, but, in less than 24 hours, I will be with them!!!
One resolution I have made, and try always to keep, is this: To rise above the little things. ~John Burroughs
GINGRICH: Well look, I think that first of all, you should control the border, which I have pledged to do by January 1, 2014. You should fix legal immigration in terms of visas so people can come and go easily — more easily than doing it illegally. You should also make deportation easier so when you deport people who shouldn’t be here. The 13 gang members, for example. It should be very quick and very clear.
Then I will line up and wait through the torturous moments for the gun to be fired, and then kick into high gear, fighting to find my place in the pack (or away from it), my specific pace and getting a feeling of how my body is doing ; the rest is just pacing and mind games. I’ll walk through the entire route in my mind, imagining each turn and hill and straightaway, and when and where I’ll turn on the juice, hoping that my new Kinvara3s will propel me to greatness.
Sonja:In Acts when he is talking to the jailor…how do you explain those away?
And, if he dies, I'll never know!
The DEIS describes “a largely abandoned-looking area of Brooklyn,” though that doesn’t acknowledge some of the organic redevelopment that had been occurring, but was stalled by the Atlantic Yards announcement and acquisition of property by the developer. It states: "The blighted conditions appear to be limited in large part to the project site itself." That likely will be used by DDDB's lawyer to support the "artificial construct" claim.
Edit: Additional beers as they roll in.
Have a happy Sunday! We are having a wedding shower for my cousin and his fiancee. I spent part of yesterday making a yummy cake for the shower. I used a very easy recipe from Kevin and Amanda. Love their site!
The “Vasaloppet” ski race went ahead today. From the start at the small village of Sälen down to the finish in the town of Mora, 90 km of cross-country skiing on a beautiful winter Sunday. 17.000 people at the start and a Swede was first to cross the finish line. 4 hours of skiing at high-speed. This race is a Swedish tradition from way back. This years race is the 86th in order and there’s no sign of an end for this competition anytime soon. Only thing that can stop it is if the climate change will bring on too warm winters with not enough snow.
300 comments
Bake for 30 to 35 minutes or until cake has risen to top and is puffed and golden.
There wasn't any thought to make these groups every other month? Or try to adjust it a bit to make it more cost effective? Nope, it is on the chopping block. Has management even thought about attending one of these groups to see what is going on in it? Or talk to parents about what they get out of 2 hours a month?
but whatever. i’m toasting to a good year ahead, seeing as i’m leaving school in less than ten weeks, and i’ll be getting my license at the end of the year (damn freaking right i’m getting it, there’s no what if! because then i’ll have to maybe, say, commit suicide), and hopefully enroll in a good college and start living life :) i’m also toasting to good maggi gorengs and ramly burgers, 7-11s, pavillion and de haven; miniskirts and high heels, all-year-long summer weather, chivas and vodka, sticks and stones, and old and new friends.
Also, something to keep in mind, cyanobacteria (often wrongly called an algae) does the reverse of this and converts gaseous nitrogen back into ammonium or one of the nitrogen species for use by itself and/or plants or true algaes. So if you have a cyano outbreak, all the nitrifying and denitrification bacteria in your tank are just keeping up with the cyano and not doing anything with fish waste, uneaten food, etc.
“12 Angry Men: From TV to The Big Screen” features film scholar Vance Kepley talking about how it went from a teleplay to film. Rather fittingly, he briefly gives the origins of 12 Angry Men and its numerous adaptations over the years. He talks about the challenges of working in live T.V.
This week at Gingersnap Creations during the month of March's focus on family the challenge is Border Punches #GC142. This card is for my daughter, my little sweetie pie who used to wear bunny ears around the house at Easter time when she was little!
Clearly, there are many more jobs that involve some higher degree of risk than there are those that involve little or no risk at all.
*you don't need children to take part!
I drained the water, and refilled with warm water and let them soak a bit more. They are soaking now... I will go check on them in a moment, and then squeeze out the water, and hang them up to dry.
#1 ~ Jet Black Archival Ink
If RFC is “convicted” in relation to this matter, then as this would date back over a number of years, it would be a very difficult decision for the football authorities. It would actually suit them, to be frank, if RFC was in liquidation by then.
In repsonse to Racaire's request for more project postings, I'm sharing my contrinbution to the Estrella Gift Basket.
I've always loved the more eastern influenced Regency looks, like the ones in the movies Immortal Beloved and Vanity Fair, so much more fun than yet another boring white "nightgown" dress, IMHO. So when I decided I wanted to make a new open robe to cover my, um, boring old white "nightgown" dress, I wanted to go exotic. This fabric was originally ordered for a Polonaise but once I got it seemed a little more Regency than Georgian and it also had a much softer hand than I'd anticipated, so Regency it is. The front under vest part is a remnant from my "Water" Victorian fancy dress costume that was in the stash, and the trims are all on-sale trims bought from Jo Anns ages ago. I'm already starting to think of this as my Regency Belly Dance Costume - LOL!
ROMNEY: Well, the reason that there’s not peace between the Palestinians and Israel is because there is — in the leadership of the Palestinian people are Hamas and others who think like Hamas, who have as their intent the elimination of Israel. And whether it’s in school books that teach how to kill Jews, or whether it’s in the political discourse that is spoken either from Fatah or from Hamas, there is a belief that the Jewish people do not have a right to have a Jewish state.
I couldn't help but be in the snowman mood as it is really blustery outside today. No snow...thankfully but the winter feeling is in the air.
In fact the audience was amazing and helped to make it a perfect night out!
Theme: Randomly Picked Soup (vegetarian)
Really? Is forgiveness all about you? What did Jesus say about forgiving people who sin against you?
But I suspect that that is not the real reason at all. The real question is why more don’t seek such training.
Thanks for understanding everyone! AND look out for the BIG reveal!
From the solar systems of the heavens
One of the things to consider is the upgrades or renovations that you may have made to the property. While making improvements to a home can be a good thing, there are some additions that can make or break your property’s resale value.
Soul Clap - Love Light
The streets are filled with smoke, the stench is horrendous. The Government has sent out the national guard, whats left of them any way to burn the infected in hopes of containing the disease. For all we know we’re spreading the disease faster by burning them. The living death they are calling it, a wasting disease that rots you from the inside out. Your organs shut down, your muscles atropine, and your body dies, but your mind, your mind continues to function locking you in the unending agony and mental anguish of death. They say its the only humane way to end their suffering, but I think we’ve lost our humanity. I witnessed one of the burnings, a young woman about nineteen or twenty, withering in agony silently screaming as the flames ate away her flesh. I couldn’t bear it, I still can’t. Even now when I close my eyes I see her face contorted in pain. It took the medical profession months to realize what was happening. I tried to warn them, so we could contain it before it got out of control, no one listened. Now they’ve shut down the hospitals, abandoning people to suffer whether they have the disease or not. The epidemic has reached Europe now, Governments have started closing its boarders. People are hiding in their homes afraid to venture out.
worn
These bigfoot-like animals have the digestive systems of omnivores, but can adapt to a steady diet of beer, pizza and chicken wings, which make up the majority of their diets, during the 5 month football season. Seeing that they are deprived of freshly baked goods, my bait of choice is the Blueberry "boy bait" cake. With a tender, buttery crumb, this cake is 95% effective in catching the football head of your choice.
Reports take between 4 to 6 weeks – I know, it feels like forever but I have to work around my my full-time job! I always update as I go along so clients know what to expect. I give an initial estimation as to when I will start reading, and when I aim to have the report completed. I often have to ask for more time as I go along but the reports take a very long time to assemble. I would rather not rush and deliver something of high standard.
By way of comparison, independent (private practice) midwives value the strong commitment they make to individual women, and very rarely ask another midwife to take over. The 'employment' arrangement is a private one, between the individual woman and her private midwife or midwives.
his life changed completely after that he moved out of his house
Once it is tabled, it has to be approved by the Dewan Negara, which means the session will drag on until next year.
-A series in which I argue that the women’s pictures of the 1930-50s are better in their overall depiction of women versus the modern equivalent (the chick flick). I will compare and contrast a classic women’s picture to a recent chick flick who share similar themes and story arcs to support my point. First up will be Dark Victory (1939) versus Sweet November (2001)
*Joseph started working in Brigham City in June 2011. He worked 2.5 days a week and was looking forward to being busy and buying a practice in our "home town"
Larry Sagers wrote an article called "Vegetable-gardening-101" in the Deseret news that I noticed separates the crops a little differently. This is an excellent article and very helpful to read as well. He is more specific - grouping the items from the leaf and root crop category into hardy and semi-hardy.
into a wounded kiss spurned.
Miracle Fortress – Was I the Wave?
“For behold,” He says, “I and the children whom God hath given Me.”
and he's using me as a test dummy.........
The sentiment is from Magnolia. I love it,
Those two days were really nice, and the gig was awesome. Can't wait for the next one !
Probably not a HUGE surprise why I’m posting this but here’s the latest from Diana Gabaldon and her next release – THE SCOTTISH PRISONER, due out Nov. 29. I might get it because she’s been working on it for so long and it sounds interesting. Plus, it includes a preview from the next OUTLANDER novel. (Not this excerpt — the book!) This is from her blog.
Therefore last saturday was the perfect opportunity, when a dear friend of mine celebrated her birthday/farewell party, as she got a job in Miami (grrrrrrr…!) and had to move away from Amsterdam. And so I dove in the kitchen to make this monstrous chocolate cake. This recipe is surprisingly easy to follow, and has three stages. to make sure my cake was big enough for this occasion, I used 1,5 times the ingredients and used a 28 cm bakepan. and it was big alright! what do you expect with almost a kilo of sugar (or maybe a bit more) and a small mountain of butter… when you’re making it you think “I’m not gonna take a bite of this now that I know how much is actually in it).
Accordingly, the proposed rules state:
“How are you doing, Bertie,” Reginald asked finally. “Are you tired?”
The hurt, the blame!
The first time a student asked me that question, it took me a while to figure out what, exactly, he was asking me. Eventually I realized he was asking me why I, an adult, would read books written for middle grade readers. That was answered easily enough. Middle grade books are fun! At least the middle grade books I like to read are. They have plot. Things happen in them. The characters have amazing adventures.
(wedigboats = we dig boats. Get it?)
House and the team take on the case of a 22-year-old minor league hockey player who collapsed while coughing up blood after a fight on the ice. Meanwhile, House drops a bomb on Wilson, and Chase offers to help Park change her living arrangement in the “Gut Check” episode of HOUSE airing Monday, April 9 (9:00-10:00 PM ET/PT) on FOX. (HOU-816) (TV-14 D, L, V)
“Until I can give you something better.”
Fall is here and that means one thing. Cross Country season is upon us. It was a great summer of Track and Field. All of the Gala League meets were televised as well as others, great World Championships in Berlin. Good times, literally. Two Americans, Dathan Ritzenhein (12:56.27 New AR) and Matt Tegenkamp (12:58.56) , broke 13 minutes in the 5000 in the span of one week. 3 Americans (Evan Jager, German Fernandez and Chris Derrick) all no more than 2 years removed from the American High School system ran sub 13:30, all before they are old enough to drink a beer in a bar.
I haven't had any time to play with it so I can't tell you any more than that I received it. I hope to take it up to my Mom's in the next week or two for her to try out.
Here's a pertinent and very telling quote by McCain:
I loved seeing all the different formats people tried
Men by norm have fewer accessories than women. The same is true for both formal and casual wear. So on average, a man can wear a wristwatch, a ring, maybe a bracelet or a necklace (rarely), and a belt buckle. These go well with a typical suit. They look neat and create some sort of balance. Anything more than that can be considered overdressing.
The randomly chosen winner of last weeks prize is:
Let’s cut Tejada some slack though. He’s a young dude who is making probably close to league minimum and has to come in from Panama as well. I’m sure there are other players who are coming in from great lengths, but I’m willing to give him the benefit of the doubt for some reason.
There was a party at the crackhouse. Our other roommate was hosting, so we pretty much just observed its existence. At probably about 2am, we decided to hit the hay. The next day she had an interesting story to tell:
Books and letters from my father.
creep in dawn of delight
On the agenda? A mani/pedi, fresh flowers, a long hot bath and lots and lots of sleep.
Put the egg whites in the bowl of an electric mixer fitted with the whisk attachment, and whip on medium-high speed, gradually adding the remaining 1/4 cup ( 50 grams ) sugar, until the whites hold stiff peaks.
If you have no idea what I'm talking about, ignore the previous paragraph. If you know exactly what I'm talking about, make fun of me in the comments.
“Fellows,” Don interjected, “you ain’t seen nothing till you’ve seen
But like anything else, there are distinctions between some awful contemporary pieces from the big box chain stores, and the excellent antique or vintage pieces.
What a difference a year makes, especially for a dog! I started blogging just about a year ago, and so far my blog has had 25,000 hits– I figure that for a dog, that’s about 7 years and a million hits. Most humans that come here want to learn more about (a) fracking, (b) symbolic interactionism, or (c) Panic! At the Disco. Sometimes, they just want to see a cute picture of me:
“Tommy! Tommy!”
To get their message of peace for poultry out, The Alliance To End Chickens as Kaporos is going to host not one, not two, but THREE two-hour protest/demonstrations in Brooklyn this year. The group argues their side like this: The use of chickens in Kaporos rituals is cruel and contrary to Jewish teachings. It is not a mitzvah but a custom that originated in the middle ages. Most observers give money to charity which they express symbolically by swinging coins while reciting prayers for mercy and peace. Swinging and slaughtering chickens as Kaporos violates tsa’ar ba’alei chaim, the Jewish mandate not only to avoid needlessly hurting animals, but to show them compassion.
Researchers in St. Louis, Missouri interviewed 4,144 women about birth control methods and found that 45 per cent relied too heavily on their contraceptives to do the job without fail.
191 ***3. Book Review: Robert McDonald, Pillar & Tinderbox: The Greek Press and the Dictatorship (New York, 1983). Journal of Modern Greek Studies, vol. 3, pp. 105-10 (May 1985). (Incorporated in Item B-5, above, pp. 508-15 (1992).)
I walk up the muggy street beginning to sun
The First Lady showing up for Darden's announcement is a terrific incentive for other restaurateurs to follow suit and make changes, Nestle said.
So he is in Poland drinking cheap beer, on the strict promise he bring me back my yummy Cherry Vodka, (and it's a helluva lot cheaper in Poland than on that website, let me tell you!) and I am staying home, reading, snoozing, possibly doing some reorganizing and cleaning out, and we both get what we want without having to piss off the other.
The initiative is designed to help targeted areas renovate housing and repopulate neighborhoods with the goal of stabilizing prices and increasing safety. The organizations will pilot the program in Baltimore and Atlanta.
Toby Moses Little Mans
The following pictures are "before" pictures, as in, while the apartment was still empty, before moving day. My goal is to post "after" pictures, one room at a time, as we get everything settled and purchase furniture.
“Our Lady of Blessed Acceleration, don’t fail me now”
To my knowledge, I've now eaten at every Japanese Restaurant in Marin, including those which may just have the Japanese part as a sideline! We do have quite a variety, and I'll have to update the summary for Marin Japanese restaurants soon.
This cheery "Alexis Lamp" is so chunky and simple, I just love it (I really love the yellow one!). Even on "special" the base alone is $99 (drum shade sold separately). I suppose you could find a similar shape lamp at a thrift store, and a can of spray paint, and go to town. Inspiration is good though, no?
Imagine for a moment what it would feel like if people walked into your company and used the lobby to call your competitors and buy their products. That’s standard consumer behavior in a bookstore. People browse, find a book they like, pull out their smart phone, and order online.
I called them the tribe because you always saw the same faces at protests, although they held widely varying views on the nature of their mythic united Ireland.
But, not everyone is content to just sit back and ignore these killings. After all the victims are children. No matter what type of life they are living, they deserve protection from this evil killer. There is an Alienist in the city that wants the killer stopped. His name is Kreizler and he is what today is known as a Psychologist. Kreizler forms a group of friends to try and stop this killer. The group initially consists of Moore who is a New York Times Reporter and Sarah who is a Secretary at the Police Department. The little group eventually expands to include Kreizlers servants and a couple of ex Police Officers. This group will take you into the belly of this dark world and it is sometimes very graphic because when this killer kills a victim, it is very gruesome and even worse because his victims are children.
There is a linkage between U.S. foreign and immigration policy that is detrimental to our interest (check out the connection between the Rockefellers and the American foreign policy establishment through organizations like the Council on Foreign Relations and the Trilateral Commission), the systematic robbery of the American people by Wall Street bankers through the Federal Reserve Bank, and the bankrupting of the federal and state governments. This linkage betrays an agenda that seeks a global concentration of power and wealth. These linkages are public record and are easily verifiable.
If you would like to have a good hearty laugh, please marvel at the imprudent , nonsensical, and inane, staff of PDRM.
A cruise on the largest ship in the world, Allure of the Seas. She was busy..rock climbing, wave surfing, zip lining...shopping, eating, having a beverage or two.
OK...so here I am having my morning cup.
Tomorrow is mystery.
cannibal corpse Milwaikee Metalfest, Milwaukee, WI USA 1992
Thankfully I still have some of that Stella in the fridge. Thank the gods. But I've not used the word piss enough. Piss Piss Piss Piss Piss Piss. Now I'm happy.
"Pool Water Shook in Staten Island"
There’s parts of this whole campy style that still make me cringe, like how everything is labeled. I get that this is done for kids. Or maybe it’s because Batman is forgetful. Whatever the case, it’s pretty hilarious that when the secret panel in Bruce’s study opens to reveal two fireman’s poles that they’re labeled “To the Batcave.” When they bring the Penguin (in a disguise that fools no one) to the Batcave, the Penguin asks for water and Batman points him in the right direction, stating, “The drinking water dispenser is clearly marked.”
Two (2) Panther's Quest pages by Gene Colan from Jungle Action #11
I've been wearing it for a few days and I love it.
Yann - the sailor collar dress in red, white and blue
I went to cheer on someone at the St. Luke's Half Marathon in Allentown, PA today. It was so fun!! I've never been a spectator before. Of course, during the entire race when I wasn't cheering, all I could think was "what am I doing on the sidelines?" That question could really relate to any part of life, you know? Why wait to join in on the fun? DO IT NOW!
The video was filmed by family friend and sheepdog breeder Dan Westman. Entitled “Champis - den vallande kaninen” (‘Champis – the herding rabbit’ in English), it shows five minutes of the bouncing bunny making light work of a small herd of sheep, a skill most likely mimicked from his border collie buddies.
Quinoa is a great, gluten-free grain with a slightly nutty taste that is packed with protein and the only grain that is a perfect protein. Sick of eating rice? There are lots of great dishes you can make with quinoa. Here’s my personal recipe.
Lastly, there is the problem that activism is usually reactive. We assume, because we are ethical, that other people are as well; that they have a conscience and are not wholly dominated by personal selfishness. Then, when they demonstrate that they are so dominated, we have to react. To be effective we must build large-scale movements, and we must anticipate this: we must be proactive, and unpredictable.
3 ways that I have fun while traveling are…
11. Heroes of The yellow Cross
You’ll notice that I didn’t use any names in this review. That’s because, first of all, the war setting makes it unclear whether or not the characters are using their real names, and secondly, part of the enjoyment of this book is figuring out when characters are telling the truth and when they are not. Don’t let that—or my woefully inadequate review—deter you. Read CODE NAME VERITY; I am 99% sure you won’t regret it. Recommended for readers who enjoy historical fiction set in World War II and character-driven novels.
In the mid-1920s, the directors of Hall China began an association with the Jewel Tea Co. to produce an exclusive line of dinnerware. For all the major refrigerator manufacturers, Hall also produced china pieces including pitchers, china boxes for leftovers and butter and cheese dishes.
of his ear,
These two cards above were made for my last Stamp Class at my home, where I showed Mel and Lindy (hi ladies!), how to stamp on vellum (thanks for letting me CASE you Kathy Tannner)...it was a small and intimate class this month after my inaugral one in my new craft space with 8 attendee that time! I think this was better until I can reorganise my space as it now also has a Sofa Bed in it for our guests to stay.
Thank you so much Becky for gifting Sally such a sweet needlebook. I know she will use and enjoy it and be forever reminded that there are very special people out there in the world.
Intent
—May 25, 2006
Don’t ask me what the others are because I’m already wasting too much time blabbing on about this fabulous fantastic movie. But one of them is the chase in the woods from The Piano. There.
When the frost has turned 'em rotten," Sammy said.
Last year when we moved a couple streets over our old Internet provider didn’t service this street; in fact we got trapped as only one company did.. The service was so bad we had an excelorator installed which temporarily made it better, but not long after it plummeted to less then dial up speed!!
The Shabby Girls thank you ALL for sharing your special paper crafting talents with us here in the Tea Room! The talent and inspiration continuously amazes and inspires us all!!! Your talent and creativity makes it nearly impossible to pick winners each week! And now, without further ado, here are the creations that caught my eye this week for capturing the essence of the 'Homegrown Flowers' challenge by creating a project USING HANDMADE FLOWERS:
I really need to take some photos tomorrow morning in good light - I can't believe I haven't posted the delicious projects we made at the Launch last month. My Mother's Day class was also really fun. I'm planning a Big Shot class this month, so watch out for more details about that!
10. Democratise the City of London
My Cousin and I got some interesting tidbits, and I’m hoping to have some of that loaded into the tree sometime in the upcoming week. Most of what we found was connected to our tree, but not directly.
When you run, your primary energy source is muscle glycogen, (the complex sugar molecules that you burn for energy). You can only store a certain amount of glycogen in your muscles which is why runners carbo-load leading up to a race! & since carbs are your primary fuel source it makes a lot of sense that you replenish spent carbohydrate supplies immediately following a long run, ideally within 30minutes of completion.
So where are the really good apps?
Her authentic spiritual state is between her and God, but I’m not seeing biblical fruit here.
And Her Self broke into selves and became the mother-truth-table of all existence.
If you’re still feeling anxious. There are a number of helpful websites and forums that offer advice to owners and pets. Pets and Travel has advice on every type of transport from cars, planes, boats and caravans. The website is also filled with useful case studies of other travellers’ experiences.
Edwin Blumenfeld
Istas AS, Demmler GJ, Dobbins JG, Stewart JA. Surveillance for congenital cytomegalovirus disease: A report from the National Congenital Cytomegalovirus Disease Registry. Clin Infect Dis 1995; 20: 665-670.
How to apply conventional wisdom in unconventional times? It’s not so clear. Which of these two aphorisms is right for companies in this hiring environment “All that glitters is not gold” or “Never look a gift horse in the mouth”? With so many people looking for a job, the temptation to hire a really good, potentially overqualified person is continuously present. But no matter how bright that new star shines in the cosmos of the available – management must not ignore the question of how that star will shine in your specific company’s galaxy. “Do we promote from the inside or hire from the outside?” still remains a difficult question.
So that your No Deposit House has been up for sale for months and you can no more make home loan repayments on your own aged and brand new houses. You’re eager to marketplace like the desire to generate losses. Right now might be time to consider making your personal Bad Credit Home the actual rent-to-own property. Also you have a 100% finance option from the Vendor Finance Home.
and thats the part that burns in my heart and keeps me hanging on
So – Magda and Ilza will look after Mes Amis. The guests are sorted, the dogs are sorted. Off to three or maybe four or maybe five weeks of no routine. Anna’s sister, Hester, volunteered to provide padkos to sustain us through the morning. (padkos = road food or food to be eaten when embarked on a long journey). Hester did us proud.
Interesting that you bring up future novels. Fan fiction readers know I’ve written two companion manuscripts to THE THREE COLONELS. One is a sequel to Persuasion named Persuaded to Sail (formerly The Unexpected Passenger), featuring Captain Frederick Wentworth and his lovely wife, Anne. The other is a Jane Austen/Scarlet Pimpernel crossover entitled The Last Adventure, staring Captain Frederick Tilney. We’ll see if Sourcebooks picks them up.
Mr Oosthuizen was attacked and fired upon at his car-port next to his homestead at about 20h00 Friday. The attackers fled after Oosthuizen fired off a shot and then barricaded himself inside his homestead while alerting the local farm-watch volunteers -- some neighbours arrived on the scene within seven minutes while other farmers organised road-blocks around the farm and launched searches for the attackers. Mfisa was allegedly captured with incriminating materials in a white bakkie, chasing away from the crime-scene at high speed.
Mix lemonade concentrate and powdered sugar.
The sister gnome is made using a 3/4" round ball, and a 1"3/8"hold acorn dowel cap.
I think the hardest question which Augustine completely misses is why do people do hurtful things to each others? We know that we have choices in the way we react…but what is the motivation of selfishness? If we step away from theological conversation, is there at any point a sufficient justification to knowingly hurt someone? Some say yes…but I don’t know. Augustine stresses the importance of choice and free will, but are there real choices that we can honestly say belong to us? What if the one choice we deem belonged to us is immoral? What is the difference between choices possible and possibilities? Although I’ve gained a little more knowledge, I’m still not satisfied. Currently reading the Pali Canon, and Tao Te Ching.
I wonder where my words went.
His wife’s name is Ahalya. One of the meanings of Ahalya is ‘unploughed’. Brahma gave him, his daughter Ahalya which could mean some untilled land on his mountain, the Brahmagiri. This was because only Gauthama with his expertise in irrigation and agriculture, could make something useful of it.
Jenna Chamberland never wanted anything more than to be a wife and mother. That is, until she realized that her life was ending after a three-year battle against breast cancer. Now, all she really wants is more time.
Tokyo’s new, bigger tower…the Tokyo Sky Tree won’t be opened to the public until this May—so it’s not illuminated at night yet (except for the lighting necessary for air safety).
One of my goals, while here in Bali, is to keep a nature journal. I have finally settled into somewhat of a routine – of basic day-to-day living, that is – and now have some time to get back into a creative groove.
AAM: No, they are closer—you would think of the thrones as being with the seraphim and the cherubim.
02 Last Dance (Native Lab, WMF Lounge, Berlin 8.9.2001)
01/04/2012 BUY 0.01 euraud 1.24819
Anyway, all this to say there is so much information out there and all of it is conflicting. I will say if an article has a product to sell you to fix your problem, stay away. It's just a commercial for their product.
“Unless you are initiated by a bona fide spiritual master in the disciplic succession, the mantra that you might have received is without any effect.”
1: SHIRLEY & LEE - Sweethearts
During some runs we saw the cables lying loose between the wing and the hump. Which confirms they are cables and not solid rods, as with the rake mountings. Being cables they could not be for measuring wing position, as not being stiff, they would not be accurate enough. With the size of the nose hump and the other equipment to measure ride height, I now believe they are to control the droop of the front wing. Perhaps the test wing is more flexible than the usual race wing in order to achieve more attitudes under load. Its possible the hump contains hydraulics to adjust the droop of the wing to different attitudes during each run. The 2009 Red Bull used hydraulics in the nose to control the then legal adjustable front wing flap, so it’s a proven approach to fit more hydraulics into the nose cone. Being able to alter wing attitude on the move would greatly improve the amount of data gathered from each run. With there being two cables for each wing, one mounted on the main plane and the second on the flap, the wing could be controlled not only in droop but also the angle of attack. So that the wing could reproduce different beam and torsional stiffness of a future wing.
Did you know there was a right way and a wrong way to pray? Well, evidently there is. I've avoided venting about this because I have been determined to be positive. I hoped that if I kept my thoughts positive this situation would resolve itself. What situation?
YG Entertainment is coming out with a school supplies line with chibi Big Bang.
BB7 – 4.7 million (average)
To take note of the glamour.
He ordered me like a BLT off a menu.
So like those damn Jews in the days of yore who killed Jesus and ruined the ability of some folks to properly express their faith, rain completely fucked with my Sunday.
With sixty seconds’ worth of distance run,
- BBQ’d Pork
Now, I'm an arrogant ass. I want to just say that. Well, I can be. At the time I was. I had seen a lot of martial arts movies and I got the stupid idea to let him hit me. Just to show off a bit. To say to him "Hey, even if you hit me, you can't actually hurt me." There's one small problem though. Can you guess what it was? Yeah, it bloody hurt. He actually busted my lip too. In the end I actually ran off crying. I'm not sure if it actually hurt all that much, or if it was just the shock. It looks so much easier in the movies.
I am very pleased to have a guest Blogger today. Joan Price, author of Naked at Our Age: Talking Out Loud About Senior Sex discusses saying no in a respectful, gentle but clear way. It is a skill we should always be working on and I appreciate Joan sharing her thoughts and experiences on the topic. I believe her advice applies not only to seniors but to all of us regardless of age.
Because they've changed it.
Today, a British soldier from 2nd Battalion, The Mercian Regiment (Worcesters and Foresters), has been killed in an explosion in Afghanistan, the Ministry of Defence has said.
“Umaaray na ang taumbayan, hindi pa ba yun sapat para magpatupad ng price control? When is necessary? Is PNoy waiting for the oil price to reach P100 a liter? It is very clear that PNoy is insensitive to the calls of the people,” said Cherry Orendain Regional spokesperson of Anakbayan.
Himawari Youchien had its door barred. All that showed above the garage-like barricade was the sign, a hand-painted sunflower and simple hiragana labeling the kindergarten. I passed by it every day for ten days on the two mile walk from the train station to my high school. The road wound like a vine down the hillside, and I was always struck by the iconicity of the scene; winding mountain roads in rural Japan are like endless plains are to Nebraska, or urban sprawl to LA. On one side was a small water garden, a pond with an elaborate waterfall and lilies floating like candles for the dead. On the other side squatted a plain white building made of something akin to brick but almost plasticine in its glossiness, and further down the road had to swerve sharply to avoid a small corn field half the size of my American backyard. The steps up to the small door were cracked and lichened; if they were an alcove there would be a thick layer of very unJapanese dust covering them. There was an ancient, rusting padlock on the gate, and the windows were harshly curtained with yellowed linen that might once have been white. The brightly-painted yellow sunflower, its fresh green leaves and succulent-looking stem were a harsh, confounding contrast to the general feeling of abandonment and disuse.
Just occasionally, I look out of my bedroom window at night and see a ferry steaming out to sea, its bright lights reflected in the inky blackness of the English Channel. Sailors have been putting to sea from Newhaven and other Sussex towns for centuries, rowing, sailing or under power; many have failed to return, due to war, weather or shipwreck. But watching these great vessels gliding silently to goodness knows where brings a sense of continuity to an ordinary event. Newhaven has seen better days, but it battles on regardless, like a tramp steamer chugging on in the teeth of a westerly gale. Long may it do so, I say.
FB has eaten the left side of my brain.... not to make lite of all the great prostitute contacts I get in my e-mail everyday from some sort of bug I picked up from my very first FB contact (remember? I wrote about the old flame I found...). The upside being that he gave me a computer bug in my old age and not a vaggie bug in my youth. Life always has it's silver linings.
SCHOOL YEAR _________
9) Don’t Waste Your Life – John Piper
¼ cup soy sauce
BBC Radio 4's Today programme, The Guardian tells us, had an average weekly audience of 7.15 million in the last three months of 2011, proclaiming a great "boost" for the programme (see below).
Love is the reigning factor in your life, and your destiny dictates that you teach the meaning of love to all humanity through your strong sense of justice. In your personal relationships you give strength, comfort, and lasting love or friendship, and you’re always there when needed and wanted. You enjoy beauty, peace, and harmony in your surroundings, especially in your home. Your home and family are your immediate concern and, once you’ve established your brand of happiness there, you extend it elsewhere.
Why I chose this book: Because Patterson's books are quick to read and usually entertaining.
Get a new pair of fabulous, designer shoes each month from Sole Society, which will tailor its suggestions based on your style, tastes, and preferences. This deal gets you half off one pair, which you order after completing a fun, short fashion survey (no obligation to buy monthly).
Please feel free to visit each and every one of them and let them know how excited you are to see what they create for our Stamptacular challenges!
Stone Axe – II
Match 5: Mr. Anderson defeated Bobby Roode by disqualification when after the referee got knocked out and Roode hit Anderson with a beer bottle, the referee counted the pinfall for Roode which led to Hulk Hogan coming out and reversing the decsion.
And that is where my authentic trust for my kids comes in. I trust my daughters to make their own choices and to handle what comes. I also trust them to ask for help if they need it.
The children's book Everyone Poops, which documents the pooping styles and sizes of a range of animals and a little boy, did not get the greatest critical reception. Publishers Weekly said: "Okay, so everyone does it–does everyone have to talk about it? True, kids... may find it riveting, but their parents may not want to read to them about it... Call it what you will, by euphemism or by expletive, poop by any name seems an unsuitable picture book subject." Don't ask, don't tell seems to be the dominant ideology when it comes to poop. According to one grateful reader, the book helped her child "realize that pooping was normal," which is great, but it also suggests that the default belief is that pooping is somehow abnormal and shameful.
I started with my Ultimate Direction pack which holds 100 oz of water. Plus a 32-ounce bottle in the pack and my two handheld water bottles. When I’m in a situation like this I always drink my pack first, then the bottle in the pack, and head back when I’ve got only the two handhelds left. That way I know exactly how much water I have left – I’m not spending time trying to judge whether my pack is ½ or ¼ full.
Exsoteric: Which highstreet brands do you hold in high esteem and which are translating key trends most successfully?
and slowly but surely i was up to running 5k
Get free exclusive products with a qualifying workshop!
This month I was paired up with Leah, who doesn’t currently have a blog but is thinking of starting one soon with a friend. She asked me about my likes/ dislikes and what I’d like to receive. I told her I would really love desk friendly, healthy snacks, and oh boy, did the girl ever deliver!
Enjoy tomorrow and share a smile .
On our farm, we wait until April. (There are many reasons people calve at particular times of the year–I won’t go into those here). Newborn calves need to get an eartag (so we can keep records on them throughout their life) and get weighed. We do this out in the pasture with the momma cow standing right in front of us. This can be a bit nerve-wracking. We pride our cowherd on gentle dispositions, but even a very tame cow is (and should be) concerned when you are messing with her baby. Having a 1400 pound momma standing with her nose near the calf while you check it over ensures very gentle treatment of that little critter.
Pros for being a part of a tradition:
6. Travel around the world. I’d probably do that anyway. But I’d go to different place if I was hippy. Like Ecuador. And Swaziland. And Tibet. I might not travel though. Just chill in Nimbin with my hippy peeps. Doing hippy things. Maybe go to Belligen or Byron Bay. If you’re a foreigner you won’t know what I’m talking about. But that’s OK. You’ve probably got a moustache, a fez and look suspicious. All foreigners are like this. Don’t be offended.
Marge handed out the needle and then paused. He withdrew it. I had been waiting for it... this is how I knew it would go down. I somehow knew that needle was never intended for me to hold (and inspect). “Look, roll your shirt up,” said Marge, “ I'll show you how quick and easy it is!”
This has always been the strategy of the Tories give Billions away overseas of tax payers,aged pensioners money and allowances ect.In the hope that,overseas countries will buy from British manufactureing companies,so the Tory owners give big donations to the Tory Party.
Once again, the Picture It Plus fabric was an absolute joy to stitch on, though the dark color did make it slightly more difficult. However, the fabric is just lovely and the color is gorgeous. If you have the opportunity to pick up some Picture It Plus fabric, I definitely recommend it.
Get them nice and golden brown. That's about 2 minutes per side. Remove from the oil (one syllable, remember) with a slotted spoon or frying spoon. Set on a paper towel to cool slightly.
It's got a thermal lens so it it will rarely fog under normal conditions.
Ummm 4th of July weekend was horrible. People in our neighborhood were lighting off fireworks until 2-3 am. Between Kyle and our rottweiler, I wasn't sure who I wanted to hurt more. They both jumped with EVERY SINGLE noise and were on edge for the entire week. Our rottweiler is just now able to go outside without freaking out. I hate that 4th of July/Independence Day should be a day to celebrate the things he has done for his country, but it ends of being a nightmare due to his PTSD. I actually got him to stand in our backyard for about 10 minutes to watch the fireworks that the state trooper was lighting off. Our block is one of those big squares that has everyone's backyards meet up in the middle...no alley way. The state trooper lives on the opposite side of the square from us. He lit them off in front of his house and gave me a great view! At least I got to see some of them.
“Your dress”
I do not give money to people out on the streets.
I'll leave you with these thoughts from the "simple" farm girl Ugla as she prepares to leave home:When the peace of Autumn has become poetic instead of being taken for granted...the last day of the plover become a matter of personal regret...the horse become associated with the history of art and mythology...the evening ice-film on the farm stream become reminiscent of crystal...and the smoke from the chimney become a message to us from those who discovered fire - then the time has come to say goodbye. The world-bacterium has overcome you, the countryside has turned into literature, poetry and art; and you no longer belong there.
Sometimes I think that it’s not a matter of opinion that matters (hehe), but rather respecting each other’s opinions. Thank God for subjects in schools like thinking skills and history where you are required to decide for yourself how the events really took place or what actually happened. The only sad thing is that not everyone takes those subjects and critical thinking is not an integral part of education as a whole. At the end of the day it is important to take very seriously-relating to anything-the question, “What do you think? ” Whether you’re in the role of judging someone or something, or forming an opinion on an outfit, food, places to go (including vacation trips), or making small and big decisions about anything. I believe this is where it all really starts when you think about it. The more you practice critical thinking with small things, the easier it is to do the same with more serious things such as relationships, properties, businesses and so on.
I feel refreshed... renewed... reopened... and ready to take 2011 on...
“You’re all alone?” the lieutenant glanced around the tent.
She "knows" my hair! She knows where the cowlicks are; she knows how it lays here and there; she understands when I describe something new I want to do.....she just "knows".....
Paper - PTI Hawaiian shores and Yellow CS, GKD White and Green Apple CS, PTI Raspberry Fizz Patterned Paper
And the reason why such a case is not currently being robustly made is, I think, partly due to the success of the case that is being made.
Let us observe, understand and accept them as they are.
One day I will post pictures of my extended home where I can shut myself away in my kitchen rather than stand in a kitchen space of 2 square metres where everyone can bother me.
Alas, my story has run away from me once more, or is at best barely on the leash. My feet are frozen with the change of weather, and it seems an excellent time for me to sleep for a while. Next time, I swear, I will come to the particular point I started with, but I've no regrets leading you down this path. Some people deserve more public recognition than is often given to a man with a crazy job like a comparative philologist and war hero, and no-one can stop me!
SO, “LOOSE” ISN’T A BAD THING WHEN IT LEADS TO BEING FREE FROM THE PRISON OF THE SELFISH CHOICES OF OUR PREVIOUSLY ROTTING AND STINKING LIVES!!!
Now comes the hard part....
Yea my title has abso-freakin-LUTLEY nothin to do with my post but wtf ever it's hilarious and it makes me think of the guy on SNL that does Sean Connery and that right there is hilarious...
Along the narrow carpet ride,
Let’s be clear here. I genuinely do not know what they do teach at Bar school. Some law stuff and a bit of advocacy I guess. I’ve never really known much more than this and I’m not sure if it’s relevant to my day-to-day business of managing and promoting a set of chambers. If it is, well, too late …
Happily engaged for just over a month. In a relationship for almost a year (just before Chicago, actually)!
Bon Appetit!!!!
Length of the Crusade
there is talk of cancer.
With the feed-in tariffs established in 1991 by the Electricity Feed-in Law, that makes it just over twenty years for the madness to work its way through the system, and now that the generators are embracing coal in a big way, it looks as if the greenie spell is being broken.
The kids and I often feeling like we were in trouble, never knowing if he loved us that day.
So anyhoo, the recipe is a keeper cos I'm sure those chocolate lovers out there would fall for it and if not a chocolate lover, then it would at least grab the attention of the photographer in you. Either ways, its easy to make and is perfect to gift for Christmas or serve for kids' parties. I don't intend to do either, but decided to keep the recipe, just in case I became a convert!
Staff at Research Center for Prediction of Earthquakes & Volcanic Eruptions, Graduate School of Science, Tohoku University are strongly advised to focus on probability of the next major earthquake in China.
Both George Sr. and George Jr. employed other forms of psychological manipulation and domination in an effort to maintain their control over the prostituted victims. For example, they branded victims with tattoos depicting their street names, and at least one of the women was tattooed with a bar code as well. George Sr. and George Jr. are alleged to have psychologically abused their victims, by first demeaning them and later appearing to reward them with offers of love and affection.
My duvet cover is an orange and white geometric pattern from WalMart, but I also have an orange and white Greek Key duvet cover from Z Gallerie that would work in the room.
To grunt and sweat under a weary life,
It’s no coincidence that a fat cat like Bloomberg would preside over brutally suppressing a Wall Street protest. It’s also predictable that there has been a media blackout on these protests. The same people being protested own the so called mainstream media.
We arrive at the Roebuck from Richmond Park, hot and very thirsty. It's early evening and a smell of gravy laden Sunday lunches hits the nostrils as we enter. The interior is reassuringly unspectacular. It's a solid pub and has been since the 1700s, the smell confirming it hasn't been gastroed, which is surprising in these parts.
-charcoal
Last weekend we put up our Christmas tree. This was sooooooo exciting because it was a week earlier than Matt let me do it last year (I think he has turned soft now that Elle's around). Matt put the tree up while I did other decorating and then we decorated the tree together. Elle thought it was so much fun and loved the lights and sparkle. She is really thinkening up (as you can tell from the pictures) which makes her especially cute in her Santa hat. While the tree is bare underneath in the pictures we have since changed that adding two gifts for me, and one for Elle and Matt.
I must say, it looks really nice.
I also have been thinking about rewards, ways to reward myself for reaching milestones like 1 week, 2 weeks, 3 weeks etc. Only crappy part is money is tight so it can't be related with money. And damn sure not with food LOL So if you guys can think of things let me know. Thought about little things like giving myself a pedicure, painting my nails, asking my husband if he will reward me with things like making dinner for me or giving me a massage or a lap dance. HA HA on the lap dance part.
I won Bookends on eBay as a college graduation present for myself in 2002, after it kept failing to show up at any of the local record stores. Magical Mystery Tour, the only repackaging Capitol Records got right, was $2 and marked as-is because it has a skip on “I Am the Walrus.” It feels weird to hear the song on the radio and not hear that skip in that place. The album on its side is Pisces, Aquarius, Capricorn, & Jones Ltd., my favorite Monkees’ album in a pinch.
Last weekend we took a trip to visit my grandmother, who I haven't seen in a year. We also got to visit with my aunt and cousin, who I haven't seen in almost 4 years, and I met my newest baby cousin Mary Rose for the first time. Saturday night we stayed with Jim's brother and sister-in-law. They sent us home with piles of produce from their garden on Sunday and I made this salad as soon as we got home.
1 whole
I was on a roll, and my fatherly monologue was going swimmingly until Tobin interrupted and said, “But dad, I only punched him because he stole my Bible!”
So I have been sort of interested in permaculture for a while and reading bits and pieces but now that we have our blank canvas to create I figured it was time to really come to grips with it. Unfortunately while there are a million and one courses out there you have to be a millionaire to attend any of them.
As for the “ex-gay” claim that ex-gay therapy works and that sexual orientation can successfully be changed, studies now confirm that after many years in a mixed orientation marriage, the same-sex oriented spouse is still same-sex oriented (see ‘Characteristics of Mixed Orientation Couples’ recently published in Edification, a journal from the evangelical Society for Christian Psychology).
and it always gets me into trouble with people,
As I said, I have supper going in the crockpot. I'm making one of Michael's favorite meals: Crockpot Cheeseburgers with Sweet Potato Fries.
With friends, I arrived at Masjid Negara at about 11.30am on Saturday. The barricades were placed about 200 metres from the masjid (and, thus, about 600 metres from the Dataran). Speeches were given by politicians, which could not be heard. We stayed outside the masjid until about 1.45pm when the procession to Dataran started. Thousands of people thronged the streets. It was joyful, with a carnival or picnic atmosphere. Slogans were chanted, and the camaraderie among the marchers was fantastic. People of all walks of life were present. Malaysians, irrespective of race, religion, colour, class, gender and age, were amply represented. It was a microcosm of the general population.
As soon as I knew what I was making I went right to work to find the right recipe. To be quite honest while I was making the cake I got scared when I dumped all of the food coloring in the batter. It was bright red. I was worried. Once the cake was out of the oven it became more of a dark red and less scary. I didn’t get the chance to try the cake out during the party but I was told that it had flavor and was very dense.
I could make, I will not make them,
The film was explicitly written as a vehicle for the star. After Magnolia bombed, Anderson had a falling out with New Line, who had produced both that film and Boogie Nights while giving him unprecedented freedom. Anderson was able to do PDL because Sandler had a lucrative production deal with Revolution Studios—who let Anderson do what he wanted as long as Sandler was in it. In a way, he was a kind of “hired” hand with the movie—literally brought in by Revolution to shepherd an “Adam Sandler film.” Its the closest that Anderson came to being an old-fashioned Hollywood studio auteur—the kind of filmmaker who works within the pre-existing genre confines and expectations of something like Sandler’s frat-boy mode of comedy.
One odd thing became apparent in that interesting week; the average age of the Facebook campaigners was a lot older than you might think. Whilst the critical voices on the wall and on the rival Joe site spoke in SMS txtspk and looked pre-pubertal, the Rage site spanned every generation. In a bizarre rôle reversal an older generation was encouraging the young to stop listening to schmaltzy covers and turn on to some angry hard-core metal rap. Whatever is the world coming to?
Following on from my last post, here are six lessons on business and sustainable water engagement I've gleaned (do like that word) from some corporate interviews and meetings with leading companies, enjoy:
And whatever your plans lovely readers; I hope that your weekend is just as blissful as mine will hopefully be!
At the young age of six, I was whisked away, along with my eight-year-old sister to start a new life in Albuquerque with my dad. Dad didn't want the divorce and he was gonna be damned if my mom was going to take away his daughters.
He also jumped on the table while Mr. G. ate a roasted chicken leg and with the speed of a flash catched it with his paw and wanted to escape. Mr. G. just had time to safe his supper ! Of course Arthur got some pieces.
2 hours. Came, saw, got in and out. My kind of Black Friday.
- Comments will be closed on Friday Nov. 4th 9pm PST
Please help me find my way
Cultural Colour Symbolisms of the Category:
MJN
Thank you so much for stopping by the X-Press It blog, I hope I have inspired you to create something wonderful...we would love to see them!!
is the most Eco-Friendly method in most cases.
The decor varied in the different parts of the restaurant. We were sat in an area where powder pink couches lined the room, and there were mirrors, glass lampshades and lime waxed wood fixtures. All that was missing from this French boudoir scheme was a white toy poodle. I loved it and would like to imagine that if Marie Antoinette were alive today, her salons and boudoirs might look a little like this too. Other parts of the restaurant are decorated more conservatively, so maybe sit there if you are eating out with the lads.
Well, damn. But I changed the flight, I argued. I mean, I should get kudos for that (y’all know I like a good relationship kudo lol)… the old D-Magic would have completely stood her ground; and that’s not a hypothetical. I’ve been asked a few times to stay longer when visiting a guy and decided to stick to my original plans. To which P Dawg so eloquently pointed out to me, “and how has that worked out for you?”
How the hell I was able to watch this under my parent's radar is beyond me because if any movie gives off sonic and visual alarm bells of "oh shit don't let your kid watch this", it's hellraiser. The movie has so many gruesome scenes that I can't begin to choose one over another... but the whole rat filetting thing probably ranks pretty high in the food chain.
-my $300 leftover (after bills) for this month slowly dwindling away
justification and has been detained already far too long.
An interesting concept: a man in the present telepathically communicates with a newspaper reporter forty years before and – working together – they are able to stop a killer who likewise is able to transcend time and place. Time travel with a twist. I enjoyed it.
“Risks are taken when men envisage purpose, desire achievement, act with courage.
When ready to cook the gnocchi, bring a large pot of water to boil with 2 tbsp kosher salt. Carefully add the gnocchi in batches of 25 pieces. The gnocchi are ready to remove when they float to the top. Remove with a slotted spoon and place in the sage cream sauce and stir. Continue until all the gnocchi are cooked and well blended in the sage cream sauce. Serve immediately.
I won’t let you fall,
Ranking Devon - Pass The Chalice In A Circle
My mom instinct kicked in and I was on full alert. After all my son should have been on the bus.
‘Labourian Line’!
Instant Abstract expressionism. It was so fun and I was an instant star! But the weird thing was that there were other male students taking things very seriously. I didn't know about completion or anything. But I liked what I was doing. It was fun. I put my art in some galleries and then I was invited to a show at a professional art benefit show. I just went with the flow. Enjoying my fame.
Life getting to you? Take a walk. It could literally save your life.
When I got home from this something AWESOME happened but that is it's own post for another day this week.
At the Hours the Paschaltide Doxology is sung with all the Office hymns, the antiphons of Lauds are sung with the Dominical psalms in the usual order. At Prime the festal psalms are sung (Ps. 53, 118i & 118ii), the Dominical preces are omitted and the short lesson is Humiliavit semetipsum.
But on the internet, there is never any winner. You cannot win against internet bullies. You’re never going to convince them that they should either leave you alone or like you. By sticking it out through the hatred and the threats, you may feel you’ve won by not giving up. You may show the world, or the readers of Rolling Stone Magazine, but you haven’t won. The bullies are still looking up your address; they’re still fantasizing about your humiliation or death. You’ll never show them. In fact, the closest you could probably come to winning this “game” is by stopping to play. The internet sucks you in; it seems like the entire world, when, really, it’s an alternate world. It will survive without you, and you will survive without it. Only by stepping back (for more than three weeks) will someone embroiled in true internet fame and drama be able to appropriate it a correct amount of importance. It is impossible to see while you are in it. I imagine doubly so for a teenager.
Huh u were so caring,
What I did not mention in this story is the larger issue of theft. Effectively there was none, for the same reasons the renter of the car was unconcerned about details of who I was. If everyone knows everyone in a small island, stealing will be difficult to accomplish without getting caught. If I steal your TV, how will I keep it a secret without living a cloistered life? Word travels like wildfire and learn of the theft immediately, all eyes will be on the lookout, and invariably, someone will learn of its new home.
When did this happen? When did I let go of the healthy, fitness crazed person I was?
Last but not least, here is an example of using placemats as art. All these by Finn Style need is a frame!
But we couldn't be more thrilled!
· A wagon factory to be set up at Sitapali (Ganjam District of Odisha)
More mattress sliding ensued after that,
Proper camera equipment play key role for those who consider photography as their hobby. Make sure you bought a branded and high-efficient camera that come built in with many other additional camera equipments. High-efficient camera features give an outstanding look to your photographs. These camera equipments come with alluring features including more capacity to store images, high display, auto-play back, wireless network, Menu language and long running battery power.
It takes about 3 days by train to get to Hong Kong. Everyone dreams about going to the Temple. We have around 4 temple groups every year and there are about 20-30 people in one group.
I didn’t walk further than the corner to catch the sunset.
Urg.
It is this knowledge that makes me rise before the sun
For these, I don’t mind throwing those coins for a toss.
The actress told Assignment X that River's unveiling as Amy Pond's daughter Melody will have some "weird" consequences.
I think the locals have developed a sort of immunity as they do seem particularly attracted to holidaymakers and are found more frequently at tourist destinations.
"I'm not on the menu." She jammed the blade up under the monster's chin and out the top of its head. No more came forth as it sank into a black mass onto the floor.
“To some extent, the rise of the eastern powers, China and India, will ensure in coming decades that western guilt will shrivel: finally having equal powers to compare ourselves to, the West will no longer feel inclined to indulge in self-loathing, but will seek to reaffirm its sense of identity. (…) in the long-run of history, political correctness will be seen as an aberration in Western thought. The product of the uniquely unchallenged position of the West and its unrivalled affluence, the comparative decline of the West compared to the East is likely to spell the demise of political correctness.”
The ideal time to max out would have been at 9am when good overnight strength showed a mild pullback
* Take a veggie peeler and shave long strips of jumbo asparagus. You can soak them in cold water for five minutes and then drain. They make a surprisingly nice salad addition.
Jay Boothroyd has had his loan at Stoke from Wolves extended until the end of the season. Slightly surprising seeing as Wolves are still very much in with a chance of the play-offs but welcome nonetheless, especially as Shola Ameobi looks crocked for at least a couple of weeks. Captain Andy Griffin looks set to miss the rest of the season due to a hamstring injury so expect Ryan Shawcross to start on Saturday against Bristol City.
As we were wandering around (after spending lunch at Plum Valley again - once I like something I'm probably the most loyal customer you can find), we spent some time at Trafalgar Square (how I love letting out the tourist in myself) before we experienced some really bad service at Harvey Nichols' 5th floor cafe. I usually never go there (except for my YO!sushis) but since they have that nice terrace with a small but quite lovely view, we gave it a try. And failed. Something I absolutely hate about some parts of London's gastronomy? The arrogance of some staff. How is it possible to treat us, the people being served and obviously leaving a fair amount of money, in a way which is simply unacceptable?! I've been waiting for my (delicious) cocktail for like 30 minutes without complaining but as I was sitting there and seeing that nothing is really going on besides the growth of my thirst, I was THAT close to speak some clearer words (DUH! dangerous!). It was not only the fact that we were waiting... it was also the way ignorance and arrogance accomplished our very kind way of reminding that we've been ordering something a while ago. Luckily (for them), the calmer part of myself (being the person on my side) did so and OH WONDER cocktails and the rest arrived within two ridiculous minutes with a huge Sorry. Here we go. Yeah, me too. Yeah, as if kissing up to us for the rest of the stay would have helped. I'm completely fine with the extra service charge as I think it's absolutely fair to leave a decent amount of money to the service you experience but the moment I see how staff changes from super nice to ignoring us little kids (because that's what we obviously are) to super super super nice the second you remind them of their job is kind of frustrating. I have a deep respect for this kind of job as it brings a lot of power, concentration and kindness (!) with it but it's somehow interesting how they forget about the fact WHERE they work and WHAT they are required to do once they figure out that you might be just a dumb little tourist... or a little kid who took some money out of daddy's pocket (and none of these two descriptions are actually appropriate to you).
The combination of Gray’s dark story, with the equally dark artwork supplied by Ros, results in a naval adventure par excellence. Right up until the end, you have no idea how the tale will play out for the gallant Royal Naval heroes who have not exactly seen eye-to-eye throughout.
Nobody is kissing,
and we know that fashion and performance can go hand-in-hand.
8 - Rex Griffin - The Last Letter - 3:05
“The truth that many people never understand, until it is too late, is that the more you try to avoid suffering the more you suffer because smaller and more insignificant things begin to torture you in proportion to your fear of being hurt.”
Somebody to Love – Glee Soundtrack
6) Never hesitate to confess your love, who knows you doing that in that timing to that person might save his life. The people who love us are that thin thread hanging us to life.
On Monday morning Steph came down with a really bad cough. I ended up giving her steroids at home (she has a long history of croup) and I rushed her down to our GP who gave her adrenaline as well. He sent us home with two more doses of adrenaline and told me to continue on giving her the steroids for three more days. I do wonder when she will grow out of croup. Just last week I commented to Steph that I thought perhaps she had finally grown out of it because she hadn't had it for so long! Boy was I wrong. She will be nine in August, we were told she would grow out of it by the age of six.
A warm spring is ushering us into a hot summer. I sit on the deck in the morning, throwing a ball for the dog and occasionally slip off my shoes to find my way to the grass where the earth seeps into the bottoms of my feet and reminds me that in many ways I am a still free and wild like the barefoot little girl that I once knew.
The Tone Argument
What this entry is really about is why I think it’s totally cool that my son wants a pink Trunki for Christmas and how I wish he would always ask for sweet pink things for Christmas. Well, for as long as he wants to anyway.
If pressed again, some Muslims may be persuaded to admit that there was a problem with home-grown Islamoterrorism before 2001. But then they often shift their ground. Instead of blaming everything on Iraq, or Afghanistan, they now focus on the ‘legitimate grievances’ of Muslims both here in the UK and elsewhere. Thus the emphasis no longer is on the Iraq war or Afghanistan, but on the ‘legitimate concerns’ of Muslims on many - or any - issue(s).
Any article about the site evictions or another Gypsy-related matter prompts screeds of venomous and ignorant comments, the unbelievable flavour of which can also be seen if you follow the #dalefarm discussions on twitter. For some reason, there remains today an extreme fear of and hatred towards travelling people. This is not just the domain of right-wing governments in Italy and Eastern Europe, this is a widespread attitude of many many people in this country now.
I've been contacted a few times by companies to review products or to accept a free gift if I'm willing to run a giveaway on my blog. I've always been really torn by these offers. I'm thrifty so some free cleaning products would be awesome, but in the end, I felt like if I was going to be willing to do this I wanted it to be something I really believed in. Not just because it was free.
According to Pua, the onus was on the government to ensure that APs were put on open tender so that only genuine and qualified business operators would secure the licences to import cars, instead of “middlemen seeking instant profits.”
*Cheeseburgers
I love making calendars. It's a great gift and if you want to make many of them for Christmas gifts, you need to get started soon. I love the 8 x 8 calendars. They are just the right size for me.
Rudolph's Revenge is one of those Christmas beers that I end up re-visiting each year among a heap load of other readily available seasonals. The bright labelling, its ruby red hue, bready, yeasty malt-driven aroma and zippy forest fruit notes all bring back memories of many a Christmas past (more specifically knocking it back in a half drunken state whilst trying several other beers at Boxing Day parties).
A cracked glaze on a broken pot
